2652 | grey (adjective): a color between white and black | loc: grau
  EN TS: Everything is grey except her coat!
  de TS: Alles ist grau, nur ihr Mantel nicht!
  EN FS: Everything is red except her coat!
  de FS: Alles ist rot, nur ihr Mantel nicht!
  EN TP: grey coats in the rain
  de TP: graue Mäntel im Regen
  EN FP: grey coats in the snow
  de FP: graue Mäntel im Schnee
2654 | strap (noun): a narrow band that holds something in place | loc: Riemen
  EN TS: Straps on, ready for the moon.
  de TS: Riemen fest, bereit für den Mond.
  EN FS: Straps on, ready for the sea.
  de FS: Riemen fest, bereit fürs Meer.
  EN TP: wide white straps
  de TP: breite weiße Riemen
  EN FP: a leather watch strap
  de FP: ein Uhrenriemen aus Leder
2656 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: Bus
  EN TS: Two red buses. Very London.
  de TS: Zwei rote Busse. Sehr London.
  EN FS: Two red trams. Very London.
  de FS: Zwei rote Straßenbahnen. Sehr London.
  EN TP: a red double-decker bus
  de TP: ein roter Doppeldeckerbus
  EN FP: a red double-decker tram
  de FP: eine rote Doppeldecker-Straßenbahn
2657 | collage (noun): a picture made by gluing torn pieces together | loc: Collage
  EN TS: The bird is part of a collage.
  de TS: Der Vogel ist Teil einer Collage.
  EN FS: The cat is part of a collage.
  de FS: Die Katze ist Teil einer Collage.
  EN TP: a bird in a collage
  de TP: ein Vogel in einer Collage
  EN FP: a collage of old photos
  de FP: eine Collage aus alten Fotos
2658 | fist (noun): a hand with the fingers closed tightly | loc: Faust
  EN TS: He is raising his fist!
  de TS: Er reckt die Faust!
  EN FS: He is raising his sword!
  de FS: Er reckt das Schwert!
  EN TP: a raised fist
  de TP: eine erhobene Faust
  EN FP: a fist full of coins
  de FP: eine Faust voller Münzen
2660 | vine (noun): a long climbing plant that hangs over things | loc: die Kletterpflanze
  EN TS: Vines hang over the arch.
  de TS: Kletterpflanzen hängen über den Bogen.
  EN FS: Flags hang over the arch.
  de FS: Fahnen hängen über den Bogen.
  EN TP: vines over a stone arch
  de TP: Kletterpflanzen über einem Steinbogen
  EN FP: a vine full of grapes
  de FP: eine Kletterpflanze voller Trauben
2661 | tile (noun): a flat square piece covering a floor | loc: Fliese
  EN TS: The tiles form a chessboard.
  de TS: Die Fliesen bilden ein Schachbrett.
  EN FS: The tiles form a rainbow.
  de FS: Die Fliesen bilden einen Regenbogen.
  EN TP: black and white floor tiles
  de TP: schwarz-weiße Bodenfliesen
  EN FP: blue and white wall tiles
  de FP: blau-weiße Wandfliesen
2663 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: Schatten
  EN TS: His shadow is so long!
  de TS: Sein Schatten ist so lang!
  EN FS: His shadow is so short!
  de FS: Sein Schatten ist so kurz!
  EN TP: a cowboy's long shadow
  de TP: der lange Schatten eines Cowboys
  EN FP: a shadow on the wall
  de FP: ein Schatten an der Wand
2664 | drown (verb): to sink under water and stop breathing | loc: ertrinken
  EN TS: Someone is drowning for one new follower.
  de TS: Da ertrinkt jemand für einen neuen Follower.
  EN FS: Someone is swimming for one new follower.
  de FS: Da schwimmt jemand für einen neuen Follower.
  EN TP: drowning in the ocean
  de TP: im Ozean ertrinken
  EN FP: drowning in homework
  de FP: in Hausaufgaben ertrinken
2666 | flowerpot (noun): a clay container that a plant grows in | loc: Blumentopf
  EN TS: Flowerpots line the steps.
  de TS: Blumentöpfe säumen die Stufen.
  EN FS: Candles line the steps.
  de FS: Kerzen säumen die Stufen.
  EN TP: flowerpots on stone steps
  de TP: Blumentöpfe auf Steinstufen
  EN FP: flowerpots on a windowsill
  de FP: Blumentöpfe auf der Fensterbank
2669 | teapot (noun): a container with a spout for pouring tea | loc: Teekanne
  EN TS: A million teapots, I swear.
  de TS: Eine Million Teekannen, ich schwör's.
  EN FS: A million lamps, I swear.
  de FS: Eine Million Lampen, ich schwör's.
  EN TP: shelves of china teapots
  de TP: Regale voller Porzellan-Teekannen
  EN FP: a teapot on the stove
  de FP: eine Teekanne auf dem Herd
2670 | drawer (noun): a box that slides in and out of furniture | loc: Schublade
  EN TS: The table has one drawer.
  de TS: Der Tisch hat eine Schublade.
  EN FS: The table has three drawers.
  de FS: Der Tisch hat drei Schubladen.
  EN TP: a drawer with a knob
  de TP: eine Schublade mit Knauf
  EN FP: a drawer full of socks
  de FP: eine Schublade voller Socken
2673 | cage (noun): a box of metal bars that shuts an animal in | loc: Käfig
  EN TS: He is in the cage, the bird is free.
  de TS: Er sitzt im Käfig, der Vogel ist frei.
  EN FS: The bird is in the cage, he is free.
  de FS: Der Vogel sitzt im Käfig, er ist frei.
  EN TP: sitting in a cage
  de TP: im Käfig sitzen
  EN FP: cleaning a cage
  de FP: einen Käfig putzen
2675 | paw (noun): the soft foot of a cat or a dog | loc: Pfote
  EN TS: The cat has one paw on the book, like a professor.
  de TS: Die Katze hat eine Pfote auf dem Buch, wie ein Professor.
  EN FS: The cat has one paw on the cup, like a professor.
  de FS: Die Katze hat eine Pfote auf der Tasse, wie ein Professor.
  EN TP: a paw on the book
  de TP: eine Pfote auf dem Buch
  EN FP: a paw on the pencil
  de FP: eine Pfote auf dem Bleistift
2678 | paper (noun): thin sheets you write, print or draw on | loc: Papier
  EN TS: Paper is eating the laptop.
  de TS: Papier frisst den Laptop.
  EN FS: Paper is eating the bed.
  de FS: Papier frisst das Bett.
  EN TP: piles of paper
  de TP: Stapel von Papier
  EN FP: a paper plane
  de FP: ein Papierflieger
2679 | in a hurry (phrase): needing to do something fast, with no time | loc: in Eile
  EN TS: He is in a huge hurry!
  de TS: Er ist in riesiger Eile!
  EN FS: He is in no hurry!
  de FS: Er ist überhaupt nicht in Eile!
  EN TP: running in a hurry
  de TP: in Eile rennen
  EN FP: in a hurry to eat
  de FP: in Eile zum Essen
2682 | attack (verb): to suddenly try to hurt someone with force | loc: angreifen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The tiger is attacking!
  de TS: Der Tiger greift an!
  EN FS: The lion is attacking!
  de FS: Der Löwe greift an!
  EN TP: a tiger attacking
  de TP: ein angreifender Tiger
  EN FP: a tiger under attack
  de FP: ein angegriffener Tiger
2683 | face paint (noun): colour painted onto someone's skin | loc: Gesichtsbemalung
  EN TS: Her face paint is a mandala.
  de TS: Ihre Gesichtsbemalung ist ein Mandala.
  EN FS: Her face paint is a spider.
  de FS: Ihre Gesichtsbemalung ist eine Spinne.
  EN TP: a mandala in face paint
  de TP: ein Mandala als Gesichtsbemalung
  EN FP: face paint on a clown
  de FP: Gesichtsbemalung bei einem Clown
2684 | carnival (noun): a street festival with costumes and masks | loc: Karneval
  EN TS: These masks are for carnival.
  de TS: Diese Masken sind für den Karneval.
  EN FS: These masks are for surgery.
  de FS: Diese Masken sind für die OP.
  EN TP: carnival eye masks
  de TP: Augenmasken für den Karneval
  EN FP: a carnival parade
  de FP: ein Karnevalsumzug
2685 | masquerade (noun): a party where everyone wears a mask | loc: Maskenball
  EN TS: The masquerade masks are gold.
  de TS: Die Masken für den Maskenball sind golden.
  EN FS: The masquerade masks are red.
  de FS: Die Masken für den Maskenball sind rot.
  EN TP: gold masquerade masks
  de TP: goldene Masken für den Maskenball
  EN FP: a masquerade ball invitation
  de FP: eine Einladung zum Maskenball
2686 | brunette (noun): a girl or woman with brown hair | loc: Brünette
  EN TS: The brunette looks so calm.
  de TS: Die Brünette wirkt so entspannt.
  EN FS: The blonde looks so calm.
  de FS: Die Blondine wirkt so entspannt.
  EN TP: a brunette in blue
  de TP: eine Brünette in Blau
  EN FP: a brunette in red
  de FP: eine Brünette in Rot
2687 | swimming pool (noun): a big basin of water for doing laps and playing | loc: Schwimmbecken
  EN TS: Villa with a swimming pool. Very exclusive.
  de TS: Villa mit Schwimmbecken. Sehr exklusiv.
  EN FS: Villa with a tennis court. Very exclusive.
  de FS: Villa mit Tennisplatz. Sehr exklusiv.
  EN TP: a turquoise swimming pool
  de TP: ein türkises Schwimmbecken
  EN FP: an indoor swimming pool
  de FP: ein Schwimmbecken in der Halle
2688 | dreadlocks (noun): long ropes of twisted hair | loc: Dreadlocks
  EN TS: His dreadlocks are very long.
  de TS: Seine Dreadlocks sind sehr lang.
  EN FS: His dreadlocks are very short.
  de FS: Seine Dreadlocks sind sehr kurz.
  EN TP: long dreadlocks past the chest
  de TP: lange Dreadlocks bis über die Brust
  EN FP: short dreadlocks under a hat
  de FP: kurze Dreadlocks unter einer Mütze
2690 | diamond (noun): a very hard, sparkling stone used in jewelry | loc: Diamant
  EN TS: Her crown is full of diamonds.
  de TS: Ihre Krone ist voller Diamanten.
  EN FS: Her crown is full of feathers.
  de FS: Ihre Krone ist voller Federn.
  EN TP: a crown of diamonds
  de TP: eine Krone aus Diamanten
  EN FP: a diamond ring
  de FP: ein Diamantring
2691 | trench coat (noun): a long belted raincoat with wide lapels | loc: Trenchcoat
  EN TS: She is wearing a trench coat.
  de TS: Sie trägt einen Trenchcoat.
  EN FS: She is wearing a ski jacket.
  de FS: Sie trägt eine Skijacke.
  EN TP: a beige trench coat
  de TP: ein beiger Trenchcoat
  EN FP: a wet trench coat
  de FP: ein nasser Trenchcoat
2693 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: wachsen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A tree is growing from a book!
  de TS: Ein Baum wächst aus einem Buch!
  EN FS: A tree is growing from a cup!
  de FS: Ein Baum wächst aus einer Tasse!
  EN TP: growing out of a book
  de TP: aus einem Buch wachsen
  EN FP: growing out of a pot
  de FP: aus einem Topf wachsen
2694 | think (verb): to use your mind to form ideas | loc: denken
  EN TS: She is thinking hard.
  de TS: Sie denkt angestrengt nach.
  EN FS: She is laughing hard.
  de FS: Sie lacht herzhaft.
  EN TP: thinking in the dark
  de TP: im Dunkeln denken
  EN FP: thinking about dinner
  de FP: ans Abendessen denken
2698 | shutters (noun): wooden panels outside a window that fold shut | loc: Fensterläden
  EN TS: Open shutters, hot coffee, perfect.
  de TS: Offene Fensterläden, heißer Kaffee, perfekt.
  EN FS: Open shutters, cold beer, perfect.
  de FS: Offene Fensterläden, kaltes Bier, perfekt.
  EN TP: green shutters folded back
  de TP: grüne, aufgeklappte Fensterläden
  EN FP: shutters closed for the night
  de FP: nachts geschlossene Fensterläden
2702 | nature (noun): the world of plants, water and mountains | loc: Natur
  EN TS: Nature package: waterfall included.
  de TS: Natur-Paket: Wasserfall inklusive.
  EN FS: Nature package: castle included.
  de FS: Natur-Paket: Schloss inklusive.
  EN TP: nature with a waterfall
  de TP: Natur mit Wasserfall
  EN FP: nature with a busy road
  de FP: Natur mit viel befahrener Straße
2703 | obelisk (noun): a very tall thin stone pillar with a point | loc: Obelisk
  EN TS: A giant obelisk in the snow.
  de TS: Ein riesiger Obelisk im Schnee.
  EN FS: A giant obelisk in the desert.
  de FS: Ein riesiger Obelisk in der Wüste.
  EN TP: a black obelisk in snow
  de TP: ein schwarzer Obelisk im Schnee
  EN FP: an obelisk in a square
  de FP: ein Obelisk auf einem Platz
2704 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: Schutt
  EN TS: Only rubble and fog remain.
  de TS: Nur Schutt und Nebel bleiben.
  EN FS: Only snow and fog remain.
  de FS: Nur Schnee und Nebel bleiben.
  EN TP: rubble in the fog
  de TP: Schutt im Nebel
  EN FP: clearing rubble with a digger
  de FP: Schutt mit dem Bagger räumen
2708 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: stark
  EN TS: The monkey god looks strong.
  de TS: Der Affengott sieht stark aus.
  EN FS: The monkey god looks tiny.
  de FS: Der Affengott sieht winzig aus.
  EN TP: strong arms and chest
  de TP: starke Arme und Brust
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  de FP: ein starker Kaffee
2709 | marigold (noun): a round orange flower used in garlands | loc: Ringelblume
  EN TS: He wears a marigold garland.
  de TS: Er trägt eine Girlande aus Ringelblumen.
  EN FS: He wears a rose garland.
  de FS: Er trägt eine Girlande aus Rosen.
  EN TP: a garland of marigolds
  de TP: eine Girlande aus Ringelblumen
  EN FP: marigolds in a pot
  de FP: Ringelblumen im Topf
2711 | lily pad (noun): the flat round leaf of a water lily | loc: Seerosenblatt
  EN TS: Lily pads float around her.
  de TS: Seerosenblätter treiben um sie herum.
  EN FS: Boats float around her.
  de FS: Boote treiben um sie herum.
  EN TP: lily pads on a pond
  de TP: Seerosenblätter auf einem Teich
  EN FP: lily pads with frogs
  de FP: Seerosenblätter mit Fröschen
2712 | anatomy (noun): the study of how a body is built inside | loc: Anatomie
  EN TS: It's half face, half anatomy.
  de TS: Es ist halb Gesicht, halb Anatomie.
  EN FS: It's half face, half flowers.
  de FS: Es ist halb Gesicht, halb Blumen.
  EN TP: an anatomy drawing
  de TP: eine Anatomiezeichnung
  EN FP: an anatomy exam
  de FP: eine Anatomieprüfung
2714 | straw hat (noun): a light summer hat woven from dried stalks | loc: Strohhut
  EN TS: Lemons, sea and a straw hat.
  de TS: Zitronen, Meer und ein Strohhut.
  EN FS: Oranges, sea and a straw hat.
  de FS: Orangen, Meer und ein Strohhut.
  EN TP: a wide straw hat
  de TP: ein breiter Strohhut
  EN FP: a scarecrow's straw hat
  de FP: der Strohhut einer Vogelscheuche
2716 | big ben (noun): the famous clock tower in London | loc: Big Ben
  EN TS: Big Ben behind the trees, nice.
  de TS: Big Ben hinter den Bäumen, nice.
  EN FS: Big Ben behind the ships, nice.
  de FS: Big Ben hinter den Schiffen, nice.
  EN TP: a view of Big Ben
  de TP: Blick auf Big Ben
  EN FP: Big Ben at midnight
  de FP: Big Ben um Mitternacht
2717 | parliament (noun): the building where politicians make laws | loc: Parlament
  EN TS: Parliament is by the Thames.
  de TS: Das Parlament liegt an der Themse.
  EN FS: Parliament is by the Seine.
  de FS: Das Parlament liegt an der Seine.
  EN TP: the Houses of Parliament
  de TP: das Parlament in London
  EN FP: a parliament by the sea
  de FP: ein Parlament am Meer
2718 | blueprint (noun): a technical drawing showing how it is built | loc: Bauplan
  EN TS: The piano is half a blueprint.
  de TS: Das Klavier ist halb Bauplan.
  EN FS: The harp is half a blueprint.
  de FS: Die Harfe ist halb Bauplan.
  EN TP: a piano blueprint
  de TP: ein Bauplan für ein Klavier
  EN FP: a house blueprint
  de FP: ein Bauplan für ein Haus
2722 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: Spirale
  EN TS: The spiral is under the cowboy.
  de TS: Die Spirale ist unter dem Cowboy.
  EN FS: The spiral is above the cowboy.
  de FS: Die Spirale ist über dem Cowboy.
  EN TP: a spiral of stars
  de TP: eine Spirale aus Sternen
  EN FP: a spiral staircase
  de FP: eine Wendeltreppe
2723 | furious (adjective): so angry that you shout and lose control | loc: wütend
  EN TS: He is absolutely furious!
  de TS: Er ist total wütend!
  EN FS: She is absolutely furious!
  de FS: Sie ist total wütend!
  EN TP: a furious warrior
  de TP: ein wütender Krieger
  EN FP: a furious dragon
  de FP: ein wütender Drache
2724 | jungle (noun): a thick tropical forest full of vines | loc: Dschungel
  EN TS: He rules this misty jungle.
  de TS: Er herrscht über diesen nebligen Dschungel.
  EN FS: He rules this misty desert.
  de FS: Er herrscht über diese neblige Wüste.
  EN TP: a misty green jungle
  de TP: ein nebliger grüner Dschungel
  EN FP: a jungle full of tigers
  de FP: ein Dschungel voller Tiger
2725 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: kauern
  EN TS: He is crouching on a rock.
  de TS: Er kauert auf einem Felsen.
  EN FS: He is crouching on a tree.
  de FS: Er kauert auf einem Baum.
  EN TP: crouching high on a rock
  de TP: hoch oben auf einem Felsen kauern
  EN FP: crouching low in a cave
  de FP: tief in einer Höhle kauern
2726 | beads (noun): small round balls threaded on a string | loc: Perlen
  EN TS: He wears two strings of beads.
  de TS: Er trägt zwei Ketten aus Perlen.
  EN FS: He wears two strings of bells.
  de FS: Er trägt zwei Ketten aus Glöckchen.
  EN TP: necklaces of orange beads
  de TP: Ketten aus orangen Perlen
  EN FP: counting beads on a string
  de FP: Perlen an einer Schnur zählen
2728 | cuddle (verb): to hold someone close in a soft, loving way | loc: kuscheln
  EN TS: A rabbit is cuddling a fox.
  de TS: Ein Hase kuschelt mit einem Fuchs.
  EN FS: A rabbit is cuddling a cat.
  de FS: Ein Hase kuschelt mit einer Katze.
  EN TP: cuddling a baby fox
  de TP: mit einem Fuchsbaby kuscheln
  EN FP: cuddling a baby rabbit
  de FP: mit einem Hasenbaby kuscheln
2729 | crystal ball (noun): a glass ball used to see the future | loc: Kristallkugel
  EN TS: Her crystal ball is glowing.
  de TS: Ihre Kristallkugel leuchtet.
  EN FS: Her crystal ball is broken.
  de FS: Ihre Kristallkugel ist kaputt.
  EN TP: touching a crystal ball
  de TP: eine Kristallkugel berühren
  EN FP: a broken crystal ball
  de FP: eine kaputte Kristallkugel
2731 | pupil (noun): the black hole that lets light into the eye | loc: Pupille | translator note: FP pun pupil/school pupil does not exist in German; used a plain schoolkid label
  EN TS: Fact: the pupil is black.
  de TS: Fakt: Die Pupille ist schwarz.
  EN FS: Fact: the pupil is white.
  de FS: Fakt: Die Pupille ist weiß.
  EN TP: a black pupil
  de TP: eine schwarze Pupille
  EN FP: a pupil at school
  de FP: ein Schüler in der Klasse
2732 | grandson (noun): the son of your son or daughter | loc: Enkel
  EN TS: The grandson sits on his lap.
  de TS: Der Enkel sitzt auf seinem Schoß.
  EN FS: The grandson sits on a chair.
  de FS: Der Enkel sitzt auf einem Stuhl.
  EN TP: a grandson on grandpa's lap
  de TP: ein Enkel auf Opas Schoß
  EN FP: a grandson at the beach
  de FP: ein Enkel am Strand
2733 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: Armee
  EN TS: The army is charging!
  de TS: Die Armee stürmt los!
  EN FS: The army is retreating!
  de FS: Die Armee zieht sich zurück!
  EN TP: an army on horses
  de TP: eine Armee zu Pferd
  EN FP: an army on foot
  de FP: eine Armee zu Fuß
2734 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: Nase
  EN TS: The cat has a tiny pink nose.
  de TS: Die Katze hat eine winzige rosa Nase.
  EN FS: The cat has a tiny black nose.
  de FS: Die Katze hat eine winzige schwarze Nase.
  EN TP: a small pink nose
  de TP: eine kleine rosa Nase
  EN FP: a small black nose
  de FP: eine kleine schwarze Nase
2735 | explosion (noun): a sudden violent burst of fire and noise | loc: Explosion
  EN TS: The explosion is so much fun!
  de TS: Die Explosion macht so viel Spaß!
  EN FS: The flood is so much fun!
  de FS: Die Flut macht so viel Spaß!
  EN TP: an explosion in a lab
  de TP: eine Explosion im Labor
  EN FP: an explosion of colour
  de FP: eine Explosion von Farben
2736 | astronomer (noun): a scientist who studies stars and planets | loc: Astronom
  EN TS: The astronomer is an old man.
  de TS: Der Astronom ist ein alter Mann.
  EN FS: The astronomer is a young man.
  de FS: Der Astronom ist ein junger Mann.
  EN TP: an old astronomer
  de TP: ein alter Astronom
  EN FP: an astronomer at a telescope
  de FP: ein Astronom am Teleskop
2737 | black hole (noun): a place in space that pulls in even light | loc: Schwarzes Loch
  EN TS: It is a black hole in space.
  de TS: Das ist ein Schwarzes Loch im All.
  EN FS: It is a black moon in space.
  de FS: Das ist ein schwarzer Mond im All.
  EN TP: a black hole in space
  de TP: ein Schwarzes Loch im All
  EN FP: a black hole of debt
  de FP: ein Schwarzes Loch aus Schulden
2738 | exotic (adjective): from a faraway place and unusual | loc: exotisch
  EN TS: This exotic bird wears headphones to ignore you.
  de TS: Dieser exotische Vogel trägt Kopfhörer, um dich zu ignorieren.
  EN FS: This exotic bird wears sunglasses to ignore you.
  de FS: Dieser exotische Vogel trägt eine Sonnenbrille, um dich zu ignorieren.
  EN TP: an exotic bird with headphones
  de TP: ein exotischer Vogel mit Kopfhörern
  EN FP: exotic birds in a cage
  de FP: exotische Vögel im Käfig
2740 | moustache (noun): the hair a man grows on his upper lip | loc: Schnurrbart
  EN TS: His moustache is as white as snow.
  de TS: Sein Schnurrbart ist weiß wie Schnee.
  EN FS: His moustache is as black as coal.
  de FS: Sein Schnurrbart ist schwarz wie Kohle.
  EN TP: a thick white moustache
  de TP: ein dicker weißer Schnurrbart
  EN FP: a thin black moustache
  de FP: ein dünner schwarzer Schnurrbart
2741 | programmer (noun): a person who writes computer programs | loc: Programmierer
  EN TS: The programmer codes at night.
  de TS: Der Programmierer codet nachts.
  EN FS: The programmer codes at noon.
  de FS: Der Programmierer codet mittags.
  EN TP: a programmer typing code
  de TP: ein Programmierer beim Coden
  EN FP: a programmer at the gym
  de FP: ein Programmierer im Fitnessstudio
2742 | concentrate (verb): to give all your attention to one thing | loc: sich konzentrieren
  EN TS: He is concentrating on code.
  de TS: Er konzentriert sich auf Code.
  EN FS: He is concentrating on a book.
  de FS: Er konzentriert sich auf ein Buch.
  EN TP: concentrating on a screen
  de TP: sich auf einen Bildschirm konzentrieren
  EN FP: concentrating on a game
  de FP: sich auf ein Spiel konzentrieren
2743 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: steil
  EN TS: Steep rock walls? Nope.
  de TS: Steile Felswände? Nope.
  EN FS: Steep sand walls? Nope.
  de FS: Steile Sandwände? Nope.
  EN TP: steep rock faces
  de TP: steile Felswände
  EN FP: a steep town street
  de FP: eine steile Straße in der Stadt
2744 | crest (noun): the fan of feathers on a bird's head | loc: Federhaube | translator note: FP crest-on-a-shield (heraldry) has no Federhaube equivalent; used a helmet plume instead
  EN TS: Fact: peacocks have a crest.
  de TS: Fakt: Pfauen haben eine Federhaube.
  EN FS: Fact: peacocks have no crest.
  de FS: Fakt: Pfauen haben keine Federhaube.
  EN TP: a crest of thin feathers
  de TP: eine zarte Federhaube
  EN FP: a crest on a shield
  de FP: eine Federhaube auf einem Helm
2745 | courtyard (noun): an open space with buildings all around it | loc: Innenhof
  EN TS: Old stones fill the courtyard.
  de TS: Alte Steine füllen den Innenhof.
  EN FS: Old cars fill the courtyard.
  de FS: Alte Autos füllen den Innenhof.
  EN TP: a paved stone courtyard
  de TP: ein gepflasterter Innenhof
  EN FP: a courtyard cafe with tables
  de FP: ein Innenhof-Café mit Tischen
2747 | chubby (adjective): pleasantly round and soft, usually a child | loc: pummelig
  EN TS: The chubby toddler has a mace.
  de TS: Das pummelige Kleinkind hat eine Keule.
  EN FS: The chubby toddler has a bow.
  de FS: Das pummelige Kleinkind hat einen Bogen.
  EN TP: a chubby toddler god
  de TP: ein pummeliger Babygott
  EN FP: a chubby puppy
  de FP: ein pummeliger Welpe
2749 | bar (noun): a place where alcoholic drinks are served | loc: Bar
  EN TS: She sits at the bar in style.
  de TS: Sie sitzt stilvoll an der Bar.
  EN FS: She sits in a car in style.
  de FS: Sie sitzt stilvoll im Auto.
  EN TP: sitting at a bar
  de TP: an einer Bar sitzen
  EN FP: a chocolate bar
  de FP: ein Schokoriegel
2750 | houseplant (noun): a plant kept indoors in a pot for decoration | loc: Zimmerpflanze
  EN TS: The houseplant sits on books.
  de TS: Die Zimmerpflanze steht auf Büchern.
  EN FS: The houseplant sits on a TV.
  de FS: Die Zimmerpflanze steht auf einem Fernseher.
  EN TP: a houseplant on a shelf
  de TP: eine Zimmerpflanze im Regal
  EN FP: a houseplant on the floor
  de FP: eine Zimmerpflanze auf dem Boden
2751 | spiky (adjective): covered with sharp points that stick out | loc: stachelig
  EN TS: This plant is super spiky.
  de TS: Diese Pflanze ist mega stachelig.
  EN FS: This plant is super soft.
  de FS: Diese Pflanze ist mega weich.
  EN TP: a spiky potted plant
  de TP: eine stachelige Topfpflanze
  EN FP: a spiky cactus ball
  de FP: eine stachelige Kaktuskugel
2752 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Deutschland
  EN TS: The mouse plays for Germany!
  de TS: Die Maus spielt für Deutschland!
  EN FS: The cat plays for Germany!
  de FS: Die Katze spielt für Deutschland!
  EN TP: a fan of Germany
  de TP: ein Fan von Deutschland
  EN FP: a map of Germany
  de FP: eine Karte von Deutschland
2753 | piggy bank (noun): a pig-shaped box where you save coins | loc: Sparschwein
  EN TS: This piggy bank is rich!
  de TS: Dieses Sparschwein ist reich!
  EN FS: This piggy bank is broke!
  de FS: Dieses Sparschwein ist pleite!
  EN TP: a big pink piggy bank
  de TP: ein großes rosa Sparschwein
  EN FP: a broken piggy bank
  de FP: ein kaputtes Sparschwein
2754 | steam (noun): the hot white cloud boiling water turns into | loc: Dampf
  EN TS: So much steam at sunset!
  de TS: So viel Dampf im Sonnenuntergang!
  EN FS: So much snow at sunset!
  de FS: So viel Schnee im Sonnenuntergang!
  EN TP: white steam from a funnel
  de TP: weißer Dampf aus dem Schlot
  EN FP: white smoke from a chimney
  de FP: weißer Rauch aus dem Kamin
2757 | inspiration (noun): a sudden idea that makes you want to create | loc: Inspiration
  EN TS: A piano full of inspiration.
  de TS: Ein Klavier voller Inspiration.
  EN FS: A kitchen full of inspiration.
  de FS: Eine Küche voller Inspiration.
  EN TP: a flash of inspiration
  de TP: ein Funke Inspiration
  EN FP: inspiration from a book
  de FP: Inspiration aus einem Buch
2758 | bust (noun): a sculpture of only a head and shoulders | loc: Büste
  EN TS: A stone bust in the desert.
  de TS: Eine Büste aus Stein in der Wüste.
  EN FS: A stone bust in the jungle.
  de FS: Eine Büste aus Stein im Dschungel.
  EN TP: a huge stone bust
  de TP: eine riesige Steinbüste
  EN FP: a bust in a museum
  de FP: eine Büste im Museum
2759 | hero (noun): someone admired for brave and great deeds | loc: Held
  EN TS: He stands like a true hero.
  de TS: Er steht da wie ein echter Held.
  EN FS: He sits like a true hero.
  de FS: Er sitzt da wie ein echter Held.
  EN TP: a hero on a rock
  de TP: ein Held auf einem Felsen
  EN FP: a hero on a horse
  de FP: ein Held auf einem Pferd
2762 | wheat (noun): the golden grain that flour and bread come from | loc: der Weizen
  EN TS: A figure is walking in wheat.
  de TS: Eine Gestalt läuft durch den Weizen.
  EN FS: A figure is walking in snow.
  de FS: Eine Gestalt läuft durch den Schnee.
  EN TP: a field of ripe wheat
  de TP: ein Feld mit reifem Weizen
  EN FP: a loaf of wheat bread
  de FP: ein Laib Weizenbrot
2765 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: lächeln
  EN TS: The baby is smiling.
  de TS: Das Baby lächelt.
  EN FS: The baby is crying.
  de FS: Das Baby weint.
  EN TP: to smile with a flute
  de TP: mit einer Flöte lächeln
  EN FP: to smile at his mother
  de FP: seine Mutter anlächeln
2766 | cobra (noun): a poisonous snake that spreads its neck skin | loc: Kobra
  EN TS: A cobra is at his shoulder!
  de TS: Eine Kobra ist an seiner Schulter!
  EN FS: A tiger is at his shoulder!
  de FS: Ein Tiger ist an seiner Schulter!
  EN TP: a rearing cobra
  de TP: eine aufgerichtete Kobra
  EN FP: a cobra in a basket
  de FP: eine Kobra im Korb
2770 | sweat (verb): to lose salty drops of water through skin | loc: schwitzen
  EN TS: Number 3 is sweating a lot!
  de TS: Nummer 3 schwitzt ohne Ende!
  EN FS: Number 7 is sweating a lot!
  de FS: Nummer 7 schwitzt ohne Ende!
  EN TP: sweating after a run
  de TP: nach dem Laufen schwitzen
  EN FP: sweating in a sauna
  de FP: in der Sauna schwitzen
2771 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: essen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The mouse is eating ice cream!
  de TS: Die Maus isst Eis!
  EN FS: The mouse is eating cheese!
  de FS: Die Maus isst Käse!
  EN TP: eating an ice cream cone
  de TP: eine Eiswaffel essen
  EN FP: eating a cheese sandwich
  de FP: ein Käsesandwich essen
2774 | architecture (noun): the art and style of designing buildings | loc: Architektur
  EN TS: The architecture is gothic.
  de TS: Die Architektur ist gotisch.
  EN FS: The architecture is modern.
  de FS: Die Architektur ist modern.
  EN TP: gothic cathedral architecture
  de TP: gotische Kathedralen-Architektur
  EN FP: modern glass architecture
  de FP: moderne Glasarchitektur
2776 | torch (noun): a stick with a flame burning at the top | loc: Fackel
  EN TS: She holds the torch up high.
  de TS: Sie hält die Fackel hoch in die Luft.
  EN FS: She holds the flag up high.
  de FS: Sie hält die Fahne hoch in die Luft.
  EN TP: a burning torch held high
  de TP: eine hochgehaltene brennende Fackel
  EN FP: a torch in a cave
  de FP: eine Fackel in einer Höhle
2777 | brooch (noun): jewellery with a pin, fastened to clothes | loc: Brosche
  EN TS: Her headwrap has a big brooch.
  de TS: Ihr Kopftuch hat eine große Brosche.
  EN FS: Her headwrap has a big flower.
  de FS: Ihr Kopftuch hat eine große Blume.
  EN TP: a large silver brooch
  de TP: eine große Silberbrosche
  EN FP: a brooch on a coat
  de FP: eine Brosche am Mantel
2779 | iris (noun): the coloured ring around the pupil | loc: Iris
  EN TS: Her iris is blue-green.
  de TS: Ihre Iris ist blaugrün.
  EN FS: Her iris is dark brown.
  de FS: Ihre Iris ist dunkelbraun.
  EN TP: a blue-green iris
  de TP: eine blaugrüne Iris
  EN FP: a purple iris flower
  de FP: eine lila Irisblüte
2781 | carry (verb): to move while holding something in your hands | loc: tragen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is carrying so much stuff!
  de TS: Sie trägt so viel Zeug!
  EN FS: He is carrying so much stuff!
  de FS: Er trägt so viel Zeug!
  EN TP: carrying a heavy bag
  de TP: eine schwere Tasche tragen
  EN FP: carrying a heavy box
  de FP: eine schwere Kiste tragen
2782 | engraving (noun): a picture printed from cut lines | loc: Kupferstich
  EN TS: This engraving is all lines.
  de TS: Dieser Kupferstich besteht nur aus Linien.
  EN FS: This engraving is all dots.
  de FS: Dieser Kupferstich besteht nur aus Punkten.
  EN TP: a fine line engraving
  de TP: ein feiner Kupferstich
  EN FP: an engraving on a ring
  de FP: eine Gravur auf einem Ring
2788 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: pusten
  EN TS: She is blowing petals.
  de TS: Sie pustet Blütenblätter.
  EN FS: She is blowing out candles.
  de FS: Sie pustet Kerzen aus.
  EN TP: blowing petals and butterflies
  de TP: Blütenblätter und Schmetterlinge pusten
  EN FP: blowing out candles
  de FP: Kerzen auspusten
2791 | transparent (adjective): clear enough to see straight through | loc: durchsichtig
  EN TS: Her head is transparent. Cool!
  de TS: Ihr Kopf ist durchsichtig. Cool!
  EN FS: Her head is golden. Cool!
  de FS: Ihr Kopf ist golden. Cool!
  EN TP: a transparent skull dome
  de TP: eine durchsichtige Schädelkuppel
  EN FP: a transparent raincoat
  de FP: eine durchsichtige Regenjacke
2793 | businessman (noun): a man who works in business, often in a suit | loc: Geschäftsmann
  EN TS: Two businessmen are on top.
  de TS: Zwei Geschäftsmänner stehen ganz oben.
  EN FS: Five businessmen are on top.
  de FS: Fünf Geschäftsmänner stehen ganz oben.
  EN TP: a businessman climbing stairs
  de TP: ein Geschäftsmann auf der Treppe
  EN FP: a businessman in an elevator
  de FP: ein Geschäftsmann im Aufzug
2794 | vet (noun): a doctor who treats animals | loc: der Tierarzt
  EN TS: The vet is holding a cat.
  de TS: Der Tierarzt hält eine Katze.
  EN FS: The vet is holding a dog.
  de FS: Der Tierarzt hält einen Hund.
  EN TP: a vet cuddling a cat
  de TP: ein Tierarzt knuddelt eine Katze
  EN FP: a vet on a farm
  de FP: ein Tierarzt auf dem Bauernhof
2795 | climb (verb): to go upward, step by step | loc: klettern
  EN TS: He is climbing upside down!
  de TS: Er klettert kopfüber!
  EN FS: He is sleeping upside down!
  de FS: Er schläft kopfüber!
  EN TP: climbing under a cliff
  de TP: unter einer Klippe klettern
  EN FP: climbing up a ladder
  de FP: eine Leiter hochklettern
2800 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: Seifenblase
  EN TS: Can I pop that big bubble?
  de TS: Darf ich die große Seifenblase platzen lassen?
  EN FS: Can I pop that big balloon?
  de FS: Darf ich den großen Luftballon platzen lassen?
  EN TP: a bubble in the sky
  de TP: eine Seifenblase am Himmel
  EN FP: a bubble in a glass
  de FP: eine Seifenblase im Glas
2801 | headlight (noun): the strong lamp on the front of a vehicle | loc: Scheinwerfer
  EN TS: Its headlights burn orange.
  de TS: Seine Scheinwerfer leuchten orange.
  EN FS: Its headlights burn blue.
  de FS: Seine Scheinwerfer leuchten blau.
  EN TP: orange headlights in the snow
  de TP: orange Scheinwerfer im Schnee
  EN FP: headlights on a snowy car
  de FP: Scheinwerfer an einem verschneiten Auto
2803 | psychedelic (adjective): covered in wild, glowing, swirling colours | loc: psychedelisch
  EN TS: His face looks psychedelic!
  de TS: Sein Gesicht sieht psychedelisch aus!
  EN FS: His face looks grey and dull!
  de FS: Sein Gesicht sieht grau und öde aus!
  EN TP: a psychedelic portrait
  de TP: ein psychedelisches Porträt
  EN FP: a psychedelic car
  de FP: ein psychedelisches Auto
2805 | draw (verb): to make a picture with a pencil or pen | loc: zeichnen
  EN TS: He will draw a masterpiece.
  de TS: Er zeichnet gleich ein Meisterwerk.
  EN FS: She will draw a masterpiece.
  de FS: Sie zeichnet gleich ein Meisterwerk.
  EN TP: to draw a picture
  de TP: ein Bild zeichnen
  EN FP: to draw the curtains
  de FP: die Vorhänge zuziehen
2806 | toddler (noun): a very small child, only a year or two old | loc: Kleinkind
  EN TS: A toddler in a gold turban.
  de TS: Ein Kleinkind mit goldenem Turban.
  EN FS: A toddler in a gold helmet.
  de FS: Ein Kleinkind mit goldenem Helm.
  EN TP: a toddler with a feather
  de TP: ein Kleinkind mit Feder
  EN FP: a toddler in a buggy
  de FP: ein Kleinkind im Buggy
2808 | businesswoman (noun): a woman who works in business, dressed smartly | loc: Geschäftsfrau
  EN TS: The businesswoman is smiling.
  de TS: Die Geschäftsfrau lächelt.
  EN FS: The businesswoman is crying.
  de FS: Die Geschäftsfrau weint.
  EN TP: a businesswoman by her car
  de TP: eine Geschäftsfrau an ihrem Auto
  EN FP: a businesswoman on a train
  de FP: eine Geschäftsfrau im Zug
2809 | teacup (noun): a small cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: Teetasse
  EN TS: She is holding a small teacup.
  de TS: Sie hält eine kleine Teetasse.
  EN FS: She is holding a small teapot.
  de FS: Sie hält eine kleine Teekanne.
  EN TP: a teacup in both hands
  de TP: eine Teetasse in beiden Händen
  EN FP: a teacup on a saucer
  de FP: eine Teetasse auf einer Untertasse
2810 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: der Arbeitsplatz
  EN TS: Two coffees in one workspace!
  de TS: Zwei Kaffees an einem Arbeitsplatz!
  EN FS: Two laptops in one workspace!
  de FS: Zwei Laptops an einem Arbeitsplatz!
  EN TP: a cozy desk workspace
  de TP: ein gemütlicher Arbeitsplatz
  EN FP: a shared office workspace
  de FP: ein Arbeitsplatz im Großraumbüro
2811 | hologram (noun): a picture of light that looks three-dimensional | loc: Hologramm
  EN TS: He is touching a hologram car.
  de TS: Er berührt ein Hologramm-Auto.
  EN FS: He is touching a toy car.
  de FS: Er berührt ein Spielzeugauto.
  EN TP: a hologram of a car
  de TP: ein Hologramm eines Autos
  EN FP: a hologram on a card
  de FP: ein Hologramm auf einer Karte
2812 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: Drohne
  EN TS: A drone is on the big screen.
  de TS: Eine Drohne ist auf der großen Leinwand.
  EN FS: A plane is on the big screen.
  de FS: Ein Flugzeug ist auf der großen Leinwand.
  EN TP: a drone on a screen
  de TP: eine Drohne auf dem Bildschirm
  EN FP: a drone over a field
  de FP: eine Drohne über einem Feld
2814 | recline (verb): to lie back in a relaxed way | loc: sich zurücklehnen
  EN TS: He is reclining in the clouds.
  de TS: Er lehnt sich in den Wolken zurück.
  EN FS: He is reclining in the sea.
  de FS: Er lehnt sich im Meer zurück.
  EN TP: reclining on a carved seat
  de TP: sich auf einem geschnitzten Sitz zurücklehnen
  EN FP: reclining on a sofa
  de FP: sich auf dem Sofa zurücklehnen
2815 | battle (noun): a fight between two armies in a war | loc: Schlacht
  EN TS: He is ready for battle.
  de TS: Er ist bereit für die Schlacht.
  EN FS: He is ready for bed.
  de FS: Er ist bereit fürs Bett.
  EN TP: ready for battle
  de TP: bereit für die Schlacht
  EN FP: a battle at sea
  de FP: eine Schlacht auf See
2817 | watering can (noun): a container with a spout for watering plants | loc: die Gießkanne
  EN TS: The watering can has flowers.
  de TS: Die Gießkanne hat Blumen.
  EN FS: The teapot has flowers.
  de FS: Die Teekanne hat Blumen.
  EN TP: a watering can with flowers
  de TP: eine Gießkanne mit Blumen
  EN FP: a watering can of water
  de FP: eine Gießkanne voll Wasser
2818 | money (noun): coins and paper notes you use to pay | loc: Geld
  EN TS: It is raining money!
  de TS: Es regnet Geld!
  EN FS: It is raining coins!
  de FS: Es regnet Münzen!
  EN TP: a table full of money
  de TP: ein Tisch voller Geld
  EN FP: a table full of food
  de FP: ein Tisch voller Essen
2819 | glowing (adjective): giving out a soft steady light of its own | loc: leuchtend
  EN TS: Her rings are glowing gold.
  de TS: Ihre Ringe sind leuchtend golden.
  EN FS: Her rings are glowing green.
  de FS: Ihre Ringe sind leuchtend grün.
  EN TP: glowing golden rings
  de TP: leuchtende goldene Ringe
  EN FP: glowing red eyes
  de FP: leuchtende rote Augen
2820 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: teilen
  EN TS: They are sharing a book.
  de TS: Sie teilen sich ein Buch.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  de FS: Sie teilen sich eine Pizza.
  EN TP: to share a book
  de TP: ein Buch teilen
  EN FP: to share a desk
  de FP: einen Tisch teilen
2823 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: still
  EN TS: Zero wind: the water is still.
  de TS: Null Wind: Das Wasser ist still.
  EN FS: Zero wind: the water is wavy.
  de FS: Null Wind: Das Wasser ist wellig.
  EN TP: a boat on still water
  de TP: ein Boot auf stillem Wasser
  EN FP: a still night in town
  de FP: eine stille Nacht in der Stadt
2824 | nightclub (noun): a late place where people dance to a DJ | loc: Nachtclub
  EN TS: The nightclub is full now.
  de TS: Der Nachtclub ist jetzt voll.
  EN FS: The nightclub is empty now.
  de FS: Der Nachtclub ist jetzt leer.
  EN TP: a neon nightclub
  de TP: ein Neon-Nachtclub
  EN FP: a nightclub bouncer
  de FP: ein Türsteher vom Nachtclub
2825 | surrounded (adjective): with things or people on every side of you | loc: umgeben
  EN TS: He is surrounded by books!
  de TS: Er ist von Büchern umgeben!
  EN FS: He is surrounded by toys!
  de FS: Er ist von Spielzeug umgeben!
  EN TP: surrounded by walls of books
  de TP: von Wänden aus Büchern umgeben
  EN FP: surrounded by walls of toys
  de FP: von Wänden aus Spielzeug umgeben
2826 | ribbon (noun): a narrow strip of cloth tied in a bow | loc: Band
  EN TS: The yellow ribbon suits her.
  de TS: Das gelbe Band steht ihr.
  EN FS: The red ribbon suits her.
  de FS: Das rote Band steht ihr.
  EN TP: a yellow hair ribbon
  de TP: ein gelbes Haarband
  EN FP: a yellow gift ribbon
  de FP: ein gelbes Geschenkband
2827 | doze off (phrase): to fall asleep for a short time by accident | loc: eindösen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He dozed off. Art is tiring.
  de TS: Er ist eingedöst. Kunst ist anstrengend.
  EN FS: He dozed off. Maths is tiring.
  de FS: Er ist eingedöst. Mathe ist anstrengend.
  EN TP: dozing off at a desk
  de TP: am Schreibtisch eindösen
  EN FP: dozing off on a sofa
  de FP: auf dem Sofa eindösen
2829 | browse (verb): to look slowly through things on shelves | loc: stöbern
  EN TS: She is browsing in a library.
  de TS: Sie stöbert in einer Bibliothek.
  EN FS: She is browsing in a shop.
  de FS: Sie stöbert in einem Laden.
  EN TP: browsing library shelves
  de TP: in Bibliotheksregalen stöbern
  EN FP: browsing the internet
  de FP: im Internet stöbern
2831 | cheerful (adjective): bright and happy in a way that lifts you | loc: fröhlich
  EN TS: Even the sun is cheerful!
  de TS: Sogar die Sonne ist fröhlich!
  EN FS: Even the rain is cheerful!
  de FS: Sogar der Regen ist fröhlich!
  EN TP: a cheerful smiling sun
  de TP: eine fröhlich lächelnde Sonne
  EN FP: a cheerful rainy day
  de FP: ein fröhlicher Regentag
2833 | burnout (noun): being completely used up by too much work | loc: Burnout
  EN TS: Burnout: his head is steaming.
  de TS: Burnout: Sein Kopf dampft.
  EN FS: Burnout: his tea is steaming.
  de FS: Burnout: Sein Tee dampft.
  EN TP: burnout at the desk
  de TP: Burnout am Schreibtisch
  EN FP: burnout at the gym
  de FP: Burnout im Fitnessstudio
2837 | bookstore (noun): a shop where books are sold | loc: Buchhandlung
  EN TS: She is in a bookstore.
  de TS: Sie ist in einer Buchhandlung.
  EN FS: She is in a toy store.
  de FS: Sie ist in einem Spielzeugladen.
  EN TP: a packed bookstore
  de TP: eine volle Buchhandlung
  EN FP: a bookstore cafe counter
  de FP: die Café-Theke einer Buchhandlung
2838 | glitter (noun): tiny shiny specks that sparkle on skin | loc: Glitzer
  EN TS: Rainbow glitter on her cheeks.
  de TS: Regenbogen-Glitzer auf ihren Wangen.
  EN FS: Black glitter on her cheeks.
  de FS: Schwarzer Glitzer auf ihren Wangen.
  EN TP: rainbow glitter on cheeks
  de TP: Regenbogen-Glitzer auf den Wangen
  EN FP: glitter on a card
  de FP: Glitzer auf einer Karte
2840 | scroll (noun): a long rolled sheet covered in handwriting | loc: Schriftrolle
  EN TS: A whole city on one scroll!
  de TS: Eine ganze Stadt auf einer Schriftrolle!
  EN FS: A whole forest on one scroll!
  de FS: Ein ganzer Wald auf einer Schriftrolle!
  EN TP: a city on a scroll
  de TP: eine Stadt auf einer Schriftrolle
  EN FP: a scroll in a bottle
  de FP: eine Schriftrolle in einer Flasche
2847 | lung (noun): one of the two organs you breathe with | loc: Lungenflügel
  EN TS: Lungs like trees. Very poetic.
  de TS: Lungenflügel wie Bäume. Sehr poetisch.
  EN FS: Lungs like stars. Very poetic.
  de FS: Lungenflügel wie Sterne. Sehr poetisch.
  EN TP: lungs like tree branches
  de TP: Lungenflügel wie Äste
  EN FP: lungs on an X-ray
  de FP: Lungenflügel auf dem Röntgenbild
2850 | drum (noun): a musical instrument you hit to make a beat | loc: Trommel
  EN TS: His drum kit is huge!
  de TS: Seine Trommeln sind riesig!
  EN FS: His guitar is huge!
  de FS: Seine Gitarre ist riesig!
  EN TP: a big drum kit
  de TP: ein großes Set Trommeln
  EN FP: an oil drum
  de FP: eine Öltrommel
2856 | air conditioner (noun): a machine that cools the air in a room | loc: Klimaanlage
  EN TS: So many air conditioners!
  de TS: So viele Klimaanlagen!
  EN FS: So many flower boxes!
  de FS: So viele Blumenkästen!
  EN TP: air conditioner units
  de TP: Klimaanlagen an der Wand
  EN FP: a car air conditioner
  de FP: eine Klimaanlage im Auto
2859 | to meditate (verb): to sit still and calm your mind | loc: meditieren
  EN TS: She is meditating in a cave.
  de TS: Sie meditiert in einer Höhle.
  EN FS: She is meditating on a beach.
  de FS: Sie meditiert am Strand.
  EN TP: to meditate in a cave
  de TP: in einer Höhle meditieren
  EN FP: to meditate on a mountain
  de FP: auf einem Berg meditieren
2861 | to read (verb): to look at words and understand them | loc: lesen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Guess who is reading a book?
  de TS: Rate mal, wer ein Buch liest?
  EN FS: Guess who is reading a map?
  de FS: Rate mal, wer eine Karte liest?
  EN TP: to read on the sofa
  de TP: auf dem Sofa lesen
  EN FP: to read in bed
  de FP: im Bett lesen
2867 | sphere (noun): an object shaped like a perfect ball | loc: Kugel
  EN TS: That sphere is full of sparks!
  de TS: Die Kugel ist voller Funken!
  EN FS: That sphere is full of water!
  de FS: Die Kugel ist voller Wasser!
  EN TP: a giant glass sphere
  de TP: eine riesige Glaskugel
  EN FP: a sphere made of stone
  de FP: eine Kugel aus Stein
2877 | to climb (verb): to go up something using hands and feet | loc: klettern
  EN TS: He is climbing the rope.
  de TS: Er klettert am Seil hoch.
  EN FS: He is climbing a ladder.
  de FS: Er klettert eine Leiter hoch.
  EN TP: to climb a rope
  de TP: an einem Seil klettern
  EN FP: to climb a tree
  de FP: auf einen Baum klettern
2887 | fireworks (noun): things that explode in the sky with colour | loc: Feuerwerk
  EN TS: The fireworks welcome 2025!
  de TS: Das Feuerwerk begrüßt 2025!
  EN FS: The fireworks welcome 2024!
  de FS: Das Feuerwerk begrüßt 2024!
  EN TP: fireworks over the rooftops
  de TP: Feuerwerk über den Dächern
  EN FP: fireworks over the sea
  de FP: Feuerwerk über dem Meer
2890 | to ski (verb): to slide over snow on long thin boards | loc: Ski fahren
  EN TS: No reindeer today, so Santa is skiing.
  de TS: Heute keine Rentiere, also fährt der Weihnachtsmann Ski.
  EN FS: No reindeer today, so Santa is walking.
  de FS: Heute keine Rentiere, also geht der Weihnachtsmann zu Fuß.
  EN TP: to ski down a slope
  de TP: einen Hang hinunter Ski fahren
  EN FP: to ski across a lake
  de FP: über einen See Ski fahren
2892 | sparkler (noun): a thin stick that burns with white sparks | loc: Wunderkerze
  EN TS: He is holding a sparkler.
  de TS: Er hält eine Wunderkerze.
  EN FS: He is holding a candle.
  de FS: Er hält eine Kerze.
  EN TP: holding a burning sparkler
  de TP: eine brennende Wunderkerze halten
  EN FP: a sparkler on a cake
  de FP: eine Wunderkerze auf einer Torte
2894 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: Lamm
  EN TS: The man is carrying a lamb.
  de TS: Der Mann trägt ein Lamm.
  EN FS: The man is carrying a dog.
  de FS: Der Mann trägt einen Hund.
  EN TP: carrying a white lamb
  de TP: ein weißes Lamm tragen
  EN FP: a lamb with its mother
  de FP: ein Lamm mit seiner Mutter
2897 | sleigh (noun): an open vehicle that slides over snow | loc: Schlitten
  EN TS: Where is Santa? He left his sleigh.
  de TS: Wo ist der Weihnachtsmann? Er hat seinen Schlitten stehen lassen.
  EN FS: Where is Santa? He left his car.
  de FS: Wo ist der Weihnachtsmann? Er hat sein Auto stehen lassen.
  EN TP: a sleigh full of presents
  de TP: ein Schlitten voller Geschenke
  EN FP: a sleigh with reindeer
  de FP: ein Schlitten mit Rentieren
2898 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: Wüste
  EN TS: A sphinx guards the desert.
  de TS: Eine Sphinx bewacht die Wüste.
  EN FS: A camel guards the desert.
  de FS: Ein Kamel bewacht die Wüste.
  EN TP: pyramids in the desert
  de TP: Pyramiden in der Wüste
  EN FP: a desert road trip
  de FP: ein Roadtrip durch die Wüste
2900 | wolf (noun): a wild animal like a big dog that hunts in packs | loc: der Wolf
  EN TS: A huge wolf is facing her.
  de TS: Ein riesiger Wolf steht ihr gegenüber.
  EN FS: A huge bear is facing her.
  de FS: Ein riesiger Bär steht ihr gegenüber.
  EN TP: a huge glowing wolf
  de TP: ein riesiger leuchtender Wolf
  EN FP: wolves howling at night
  de FP: nachts heulende Wölfe
2906 | to carry (verb): to hold something and take it with you | loc: tragen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is carrying a big box.
  de TS: Sie trägt eine große Kiste.
  EN FS: She is carrying a big plant.
  de FS: Sie trägt eine große Pflanze.
  EN TP: to carry a big box
  de TP: eine große Kiste tragen
  EN FP: to carry a baby
  de FP: ein Baby tragen
2908 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: riesig
  EN TS: A giant book is floating.
  de TS: Ein riesiges Buch schwebt.
  EN FS: A giant balloon is floating.
  de FS: Ein riesiger Ballon schwebt.
  EN TP: a giant floating book
  de TP: ein riesiges schwebendes Buch
  EN FP: a fairy-tale giant
  de FP: ein Riese aus dem Märchen
2909 | scientist (noun): a person who studies nature and does experiments | loc: Wissenschaftler
  EN TS: The scientist loves purple.
  de TS: Der Wissenschaftler liebt Lila.
  EN FS: The scientist loves green.
  de FS: Der Wissenschaftler liebt Grün.
  EN TP: a mad scientist's lab
  de TP: das Labor eines verrückten Wissenschaftlers
  EN FP: a scientist on TV
  de FP: ein Wissenschaftler im Fernsehen
2910 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: Bücherregal
  EN TS: So many books! The bookshelf is full!
  de TS: So viele Bücher! Das Bücherregal ist voll!
  EN FS: So many toys! The bookshelf is full!
  de FS: So viele Spielsachen! Das Bücherregal ist voll!
  EN TP: a colourful bookshelf
  de TP: ein buntes Bücherregal
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  de FP: ein leeres Bücherregal
2914 | to stretch (verb): to pull your body out long to feel looser | loc: dehnen
  EN TS: Someone is stretching up high.
  de TS: Jemand dehnt sich ganz nach oben.
  EN FS: Someone is jumping up high.
  de FS: Jemand springt ganz nach oben.
  EN TP: to stretch the arms up
  de TP: die Arme nach oben dehnen
  EN FP: to stretch before a run
  de FP: sich vor dem Laufen dehnen
2915 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: pflanzen
  EN TS: The team is planting flowers.
  de TS: Das Team pflanzt Blumen.
  EN FS: The team is picking flowers.
  de FS: Das Team pflückt Blumen.
  EN TP: planting orange flowers
  de TP: orange Blumen pflanzen
  EN FP: picking orange flowers
  de FP: orange Blumen pflücken
2925 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: Schnabel
  EN TS: That beak is long. So long.
  de TS: Der Schnabel ist lang. So lang.
  EN FS: That beak is short. So short.
  de FS: Der Schnabel ist kurz. So kurz.
  EN TP: a long pointed beak
  de TP: ein langer spitzer Schnabel
  EN FP: a short curved beak
  de FP: ein kurzer gebogener Schnabel
2928 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: Raumschiff
  EN TS: A spaceship is flying over her.
  de TS: Ein Raumschiff fliegt über sie hinweg.
  EN FS: A big dragon is flying over her.
  de FS: Ein großer Drache fliegt über sie hinweg.
  EN TP: a huge pale spaceship
  de TP: ein riesiges blasses Raumschiff
  EN FP: a spaceship landing nearby
  de FP: ein landendes Raumschiff
2937 | astronaut (noun): a person in a sealed suit who travels in space | loc: Astronaut
  EN TS: The astronaut is floating.
  de TS: Der Astronaut schwebt.
  EN FS: The astronaut is running.
  de FS: Der Astronaut rennt.
  EN TP: an astronaut in deep space
  de TP: ein Astronaut im tiefen All
  EN FP: an astronaut on the moon
  de FP: ein Astronaut auf dem Mond
2942 | planet (noun): a large round world that circles a star | loc: Planet
  EN TS: There is an orange planet.
  de TS: Da ist ein orangefarbener Planet.
  EN FS: There is a green planet.
  de FS: Da ist ein grüner Planet.
  EN TP: a glowing orange planet
  de TP: ein leuchtend orangefarbener Planet
  EN FP: a planet with rings
  de FP: ein Planet mit Ringen
2949 | eclipse (noun): when a dark disc hides the sun | loc: Sonnenfinsternis
  EN TS: An astronaut sees an eclipse.
  de TS: Ein Astronaut sieht eine Sonnenfinsternis.
  EN FS: An astronaut sees a rainbow.
  de FS: Ein Astronaut sieht einen Regenbogen.
  EN TP: watching a solar eclipse
  de TP: eine Sonnenfinsternis beobachten
  EN FP: an eclipse of the moon
  de FP: eine Mondfinsternis
2950 | radio (noun): a device that plays music and news from the air | loc: Radio
  EN TS: Butterflies are flying out of the radio!
  de TS: Schmetterlinge fliegen aus dem Radio!
  EN FS: Bees are flying out of the radio!
  de FS: Bienen fliegen aus dem Radio!
  EN TP: an old radio
  de TP: ein altes Radio
  EN FP: a radio station
  de FP: ein Radiosender
2951 | hand (noun): the end of the limb you grab things with | loc: Hand | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Two hands are almost touching!
  de TS: Zwei Hände berühren sich fast!
  EN FS: Two feet are almost touching!
  de FS: Zwei Füße berühren sich fast!
  EN TP: two hands almost touching
  de TP: zwei Hände, die sich fast berühren
  EN FP: two hands shaking
  de FP: zwei Hände beim Händeschütteln
2952 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: Superheld
  EN TS: Yellow cape means superhero. Easy.
  de TS: Gelber Umhang heißt Superheld. Easy.
  EN FS: Red cape means superhero. Easy.
  de FS: Roter Umhang heißt Superheld. Easy.
  EN TP: a superhero in black armour
  de TP: ein Superheld in schwarzer Rüstung
  EN FP: a superhero in a mask
  de FP: ein Superheld mit Maske
2964 | to breathe (verb): to draw air into your lungs and let it out | loc: atmen
  EN TS: She is breathing, eyes closed.
  de TS: Sie atmet mit geschlossenen Augen.
  EN FS: She is sleeping, eyes closed.
  de FS: Sie schläft mit geschlossenen Augen.
  EN TP: breathing in the dark
  de TP: im Dunkeln atmen
  EN FP: breathing on a window
  de FP: gegen eine Fensterscheibe atmen
2967 | vet (noun): a doctor who treats animals | loc: der Tierarzt
  EN TS: This vet has a happy patient!
  de TS: Dieser Tierarzt hat einen glücklichen Patienten!
  EN FS: This vet has a happy kitten!
  de FS: Dieser Tierarzt hat ein glückliches Kätzchen!
  EN TP: a vet with a bulldog
  de TP: ein Tierarzt mit einer Bulldogge
  EN FP: a vet with a kitten
  de FP: ein Tierarzt mit einem Kätzchen
2971 | sticky note (noun): a small square of paper you stick up as a reminder | loc: Haftnotiz
  EN TS: So many sticky notes. So "organised".
  de TS: So viele Haftnotizen. So „organisiert“.
  EN FS: So many photos. So "organised".
  de FS: So viele Fotos. So „organisiert“.
  EN TP: sticky notes on a window
  de TP: Haftnotizen am Fenster
  EN FP: sticky notes on a fridge
  de FP: Haftnotizen am Kühlschrank
2973 | idea (noun): a new thought about what to do | loc: Idee
  EN TS: Someone just had an idea!
  de TS: Jemand hatte gerade eine Idee!
  EN FS: Someone just had a coffee!
  de FS: Jemand hatte gerade einen Kaffee!
  EN TP: a bright new idea
  de TP: eine geniale neue Idee
  EN FP: an idea for dinner
  de FP: eine Idee fürs Abendessen
2980 | telescope (noun): a tube with lenses for seeing far things | loc: Teleskop
  EN TS: He is using a huge telescope.
  de TS: Er benutzt ein riesiges Teleskop.
  EN FS: He is using a huge camera.
  de FS: Er benutzt eine riesige Kamera.
  EN TP: a huge brass telescope
  de TP: ein riesiges Messingteleskop
  EN FP: a small plastic telescope
  de FP: ein kleines Plastikteleskop
2981 | tornado (noun): a spinning column of wind reaching the ground | loc: Tornado
  EN TS: This tornado is made of code.
  de TS: Dieser Tornado besteht aus Code.
  EN FS: This tornado is made of dust.
  de FS: Dieser Tornado besteht aus Staub.
  EN TP: a tornado made of code
  de TP: ein Tornado aus Code
  EN FP: a tornado over a farm
  de FP: ein Tornado über einem Bauernhof
2987 | golden (adjective): shining with the bright yellow colour of gold | loc: golden
  EN TS: The golden robot is "modest".
  de TS: Der goldene Roboter ist „bescheiden“.
  EN FS: The silver robot is "modest".
  de FS: Der silberne Roboter ist „bescheiden“.
  EN TP: a robot in golden armour
  de TP: ein Roboter in goldener Rüstung
  EN FP: a golden wedding ring
  de FP: ein goldener Ehering
3003 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: Menschenmenge
  EN TS: The crowd has its hands up.
  de TS: Die Menschenmenge hat die Hände oben.
  EN FS: The crowd has its hands down.
  de FS: Die Menschenmenge hat die Hände unten.
  EN TP: a crowd with hands up
  de TP: eine Menschenmenge mit erhobenen Händen
  EN FP: a crowd in a stadium
  de FP: eine Menschenmenge im Stadion
3019 | to smile (verb): to make a happy face by turning your mouth up | loc: lächeln
  EN TS: The girl is smiling at us.
  de TS: Das Mädchen lächelt uns an.
  EN FS: The boy is smiling at us.
  de FS: Der Junge lächelt uns an.
  EN TP: to smile at the camera
  de TP: in die Kamera lächeln
  EN FP: to smile at a dog
  de FP: einen Hund anlächeln
3022 | chess (noun): a board game where you try to trap the king | loc: Schach
  EN TS: Chess is a little difficult.
  de TS: Schach ist ein kleines bisschen schwierig.
  EN FS: Poker is a little difficult.
  de FS: Poker ist ein kleines bisschen schwierig.
  EN TP: a game of chess
  de TP: eine Partie Schach
  EN FP: a chess club
  de FP: ein Schachclub
3024 | to hold hands (phrase): to link your fingers with another person's | loc: Händchen halten
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  de TS: Sie halten Händchen.
  EN FS: They are clapping hands.
  de FS: Sie klatschen in die Hände.
  EN TP: holding hands from behind
  de TP: von hinten Händchen halten
  EN FP: holding hands at a table
  de FP: am Tisch Händchen halten
3027 | to heal (verb): to make a sick or hurt person well again | loc: heilen
  EN TS: He is healing the old man.
  de TS: Er heilt den alten Mann.
  EN FS: He is healing the young man.
  de FS: Er heilt den jungen Mann.
  EN TP: healing an old man's eyes
  de TP: die Augen eines alten Mannes heilen
  EN FP: healing a young man's leg
  de FP: das Bein eines jungen Mannes heilen
3034 | to study (verb): to learn by reading and practising | loc: lernen
  EN TS: She is studying alone.
  de TS: Sie lernt allein.
  EN FS: She is sleeping alone.
  de FS: Sie schläft allein.
  EN TP: studying in class
  de TP: im Unterricht lernen
  EN FP: studying in the library
  de FP: in der Bibliothek lernen
3035 | test (noun): a set of questions to check what you know | loc: Test
  EN TS: The pupils are writing a test.
  de TS: Die Schüler schreiben einen Test.
  EN FS: The pupils are playing a game.
  de FS: Die Schüler spielen ein Spiel.
  EN TP: writing a test
  de TP: einen Test schreiben
  EN FP: a driving test
  de FP: eine Führerscheinprüfung
3040 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: Stapel
  EN TS: This pile of work is insane!
  de TS: Dieser Stapel Arbeit ist krass!
  EN FS: This pile of food is insane!
  de FS: Dieser Stapel Essen ist krass!
  EN TP: a pile of papers
  de TP: ein Stapel Papiere
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  de FP: ein Stapel Klamotten
3041 | worried (adjective): feeling nervous that something bad may happen | loc: besorgt
  EN TS: He looks worried at his desk.
  de TS: Er sieht an seinem Schreibtisch besorgt aus.
  EN FS: He looks worried in his bed.
  de FS: Er sieht in seinem Bett besorgt aus.
  EN TP: a worried boy at work
  de TP: ein besorgter Junge bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: worried about the weather
  de FP: besorgt wegen des Wetters
3049 | question (noun): something you ask to get an answer | loc: Frage
  EN TS: He has a big question.
  de TS: Er hat eine große Frage.
  EN FS: He has a big sandwich.
  de FS: Er hat ein großes Sandwich.
  EN TP: a question in a bubble
  de TP: eine Frage in einer Sprechblase
  EN FP: a question on a test
  de FP: eine Frage im Test
3052 | to think (verb): to use your head to work something out | loc: denken
  EN TS: He is thinking, not working.
  de TS: Er denkt nach, statt zu arbeiten.
  EN FS: He is sleeping, not working.
  de FS: Er schläft, statt zu arbeiten.
  EN TP: thinking at a school desk
  de TP: an einem Schultisch denken
  EN FP: thinking at a kitchen table
  de FP: an einem Küchentisch denken
3057 | to walk (verb): to move along on foot at a normal speed | loc: gehen
  EN TS: He is walking in the park.
  de TS: Er geht durch den Park.
  EN FS: He is running in the park.
  de FS: Er rennt durch den Park.
  EN TP: to walk along a path
  de TP: einen Weg entlanggehen
  EN FP: to walk along a beach
  de FP: einen Strand entlanggehen
3059 | northern lights (noun): coloured lights waving in the far north sky | loc: Nordlichter
  EN TS: Northern lights are a vibe.
  de TS: Nordlichter sind ein Vibe.
  EN FS: The fireworks are a vibe.
  de FS: Das Feuerwerk ist ein Vibe.
  EN TP: northern lights over mountains
  de TP: Nordlichter über Bergen
  EN FP: northern lights over a city
  de FP: Nordlichter über einer Stadt
3061 | record (noun): a flat black disc that plays music | loc: Schallplatte
  EN TS: She floats above a record.
  de TS: Sie schwebt über einer Schallplatte.
  EN FS: She floats above a piano.
  de FS: Sie schwebt über einem Klavier.
  EN TP: a spinning vinyl record
  de TP: eine drehende Schallplatte
  EN FP: breaking a world record
  de FP: einen Weltrekord brechen
3062 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: DJ
  EN TS: The DJ is mixing records.
  de TS: Der DJ mixt Platten.
  EN FS: The DJ is signing records.
  de FS: Der DJ signiert Platten.
  EN TP: a DJ at the turntables
  de TP: ein DJ an den Plattentellern
  EN FP: a DJ on the radio
  de FP: ein DJ im Radio
3063 | to listen (verb): to pay attention to a sound | loc: hören
  EN TS: She is listening to music.
  de TS: Sie hört Musik.
  EN FS: She is listening on a sofa.
  de FS: Sie hört auf dem Sofa Musik.
  EN TP: listening with headphones
  de TP: mit Kopfhörern Musik hören
  EN FP: to listen to a teacher
  de FP: einem Lehrer zuhören
3064 | to open (verb): to make something become open | loc: öffnen
  EN TS: She is opening the curtains!
  de TS: Sie öffnet die Vorhänge!
  EN FS: She is closing the curtains!
  de FS: Sie schließt die Vorhänge!
  EN TP: opening the curtains
  de TP: die Vorhänge öffnen
  EN FP: opening the front door
  de FP: die Haustür öffnen
3070 | hands (noun): the parts at the ends of your arms | loc: Hände
  EN TS: A tree is above the hands.
  de TS: Über den Händen ist ein Baum.
  EN FS: A cat is above the hands.
  de FS: Über den Händen ist eine Katze.
  EN TP: two open cupped hands
  de TP: zwei offene, hohle Hände
  EN FP: two hands in pockets
  de FP: zwei Hände in den Hosentaschen
3072 | to rake (verb): to pull leaves together with a long tool | loc: harken
  EN TS: Wait. Cats can rake leaves?
  de TS: Moment. Katzen können Laub harken?
  EN FS: Wait. Dogs can rake leaves?
  de FS: Moment. Hunde können Laub harken?
  EN TP: raking autumn leaves
  de TP: Herbstlaub harken
  EN FP: raking the sand smooth
  de FP: den Sand glatt harken
3078 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: braten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is frying eggs like a pro.
  de TS: Sie brät Eier wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: She is frying fish like a pro.
  de FS: Sie brät Fisch wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: frying eggs in a pan
  de TP: Eier in der Pfanne braten
  EN FP: boiling eggs in a pot
  de FP: Eier im Topf kochen
3079 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: trinken
  EN TS: He is drinking from a mug.
  de TS: Er trinkt aus einem Becher.
  EN FS: He is drinking from a bottle.
  de FS: Er trinkt aus einer Flasche.
  EN TP: to drink from a mug
  de TP: aus einem Becher trinken
  EN FP: to drink from the bottle
  de FP: aus der Flasche trinken
3082 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: Ballerina
  EN TS: The ballerina is on one toe!
  de TS: Die Ballerina steht auf einer Zehenspitze!
  EN FS: The ballerina is on two feet!
  de FS: Die Ballerina steht auf beiden Füßen!
  EN TP: a ballerina on one toe
  de TP: eine Ballerina auf einer Zehenspitze
  EN FP: a ballerina on a stage
  de FP: eine Ballerina auf der Bühne
3087 | to pour (verb): to make something flow out of a container | loc: gießen | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc gießen is for liquids; dry pet food takes schütten
  EN TS: She is pouring pet food.
  de TS: Sie schüttet Tierfutter ein.
  EN FS: She is pouring orange juice.
  de FS: Sie schüttet Orangensaft ein.
  EN TP: to pour pet food
  de TP: Tierfutter einschütten
  EN FP: to pour hot tea
  de FP: heißen Tee eingießen
3089 | to bake (verb): to cook food by putting it in a hot oven | loc: backen
  EN TS: She baked cookies. For me?
  de TS: Sie hat Kekse gebacken. Für mich?
  EN FS: She baked a cake. For me?
  de FS: Sie hat einen Kuchen gebacken. Für mich?
  EN TP: baked chocolate cookies
  de TP: gebackene Schokokekse
  EN FP: baked bread rolls
  de FP: gebackene Brötchen
3090 | groceries (noun): the food and drinks you buy for the house | loc: Lebensmittel
  EN TS: She is carrying her groceries.
  de TS: Sie trägt ihre Lebensmittel nach Hause.
  EN FS: She is carrying her laundry.
  de FS: Sie trägt ihre Wäsche nach Hause.
  EN TP: a bag of groceries
  de TP: eine Tüte mit Lebensmitteln
  EN FP: groceries on a bike
  de FP: Lebensmittel auf dem Fahrrad
3098 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: Barbecue
  EN TS: Two burgers on the barbecue.
  de TS: Zwei Burger beim Barbecue.
  EN FS: Two steaks on the barbecue.
  de FS: Zwei Steaks beim Barbecue.
  EN TP: a backyard barbecue
  de TP: ein Barbecue im Garten
  EN FP: a barbecue on the beach
  de FP: ein Barbecue am Strand
3101 | to jump (verb): to push off the ground into the air | loc: springen
  EN TS: She is jumping so high!
  de TS: Sie springt so hoch!
  EN FS: She is swimming so fast!
  de FS: Sie schwimmt so schnell!
  EN TP: to jump over a rope
  de TP: über ein Seil springen
  EN FP: to jump into a lake
  de FP: in einen See springen
3118 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: Axt
  EN TS: He is swinging his axe!
  de TS: Er schwingt seine Axt!
  EN FS: He is swinging his bat!
  de FS: Er schwingt seinen Schläger!
  EN TP: an axe in a tree
  de TP: eine Axt im Baum
  EN FP: an axe on the wall
  de FP: eine Axt an der Wand
3119 | fairy (noun): a small magic person with wings from stories | loc: Fee
  EN TS: The fairy has golden wings.
  de TS: Die Fee hat goldene Flügel.
  EN FS: The fairy has black wings.
  de FS: Die Fee hat schwarze Flügel.
  EN TP: a fairy with golden wings
  de TP: eine Fee mit goldenen Flügeln
  EN FP: a fairy with a wand
  de FP: eine Fee mit Zauberstab
3122 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: Pizza
  EN TS: Only eight slices of pizza.
  de TS: Nur acht Stücke Pizza.
  EN FS: Only six slices of pizza.
  de FS: Nur sechs Stücke Pizza.
  EN TP: a pizza in eight slices
  de TP: eine Pizza in acht Stücken
  EN FP: a pizza in a box
  de FP: eine Pizza im Karton
3124 | hot dog (noun): a sausage in a long soft bread roll | loc: Hotdog
  EN TS: The hot dog has mustard.
  de TS: Der Hotdog hat Senf.
  EN FS: The hot dog has ketchup.
  de FS: Der Hotdog hat Ketchup.
  EN TP: a hot dog with mustard
  de TP: ein Hotdog mit Senf
  EN FP: a hot dog with ketchup
  de FP: ein Hotdog mit Ketchup
3125 | hot chocolate (noun): a sweet warm drink made from cocoa | loc: heiße Schokolade
  EN TS: Hot chocolate with cream!
  de TS: Heiße Schokolade mit Sahne!
  EN FS: Hot coffee with cream!
  de FS: Heißer Kaffee mit Sahne!
  EN TP: a mug of hot chocolate
  de TP: ein Becher heiße Schokolade
  EN FP: a hot chocolate cake
  de FP: ein heißer Schokoladenkuchen
3126 | boxer (noun): a person who fights with gloves in a ring | loc: Boxer
  EN TS: The boxer looks super serious.
  de TS: Der Boxer guckt mega ernst.
  EN FS: The boxer looks super sleepy.
  de FS: Der Boxer guckt mega müde.
  EN TP: a boxer in red gloves
  de TP: ein Boxer mit roten Handschuhen
  EN FP: walking a boxer dog
  de FP: mit einem Boxer Gassi gehen
3127 | to throw (verb): to make something fly by moving your arm fast | loc: werfen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He will throw it very fast!
  de TS: Er wirft ihn gleich superschnell!
  EN FS: He will kick it very fast!
  de FS: Er tritt ihn gleich superschnell!
  EN TP: to throw a baseball
  de TP: einen Baseball werfen
  EN FP: to throw away the glove
  de FP: den Handschuh wegwerfen
3132 | to hike (verb): to walk a long way in the countryside | loc: wandern | translator note: FP pun hike up the prices does not travel; used a wrong-place hiking label
  EN TS: He is hiking with a stick.
  de TS: Er wandert mit einem Stock.
  EN FS: He is hiking with a dog.
  de FS: Er wandert mit einem Hund.
  EN TP: to hike up a mountain
  de TP: einen Berg hinaufwandern
  EN FP: to hike up the prices
  de FP: am Strand entlangwandern
3135 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: gewinnen
  EN TS: She is winning the race!
  de TS: Sie gewinnt das Rennen!
  EN FS: She is losing the race!
  de FS: Sie verliert das Rennen!
  EN TP: winning a running race
  de TP: ein Laufrennen gewinnen
  EN FP: winning a swimming race
  de FP: ein Schwimmrennen gewinnen
3136 | to swim (verb): to move through water using your arms and legs | loc: schwimmen
  EN TS: She is swimming in a lake.
  de TS: Sie schwimmt in einem See.
  EN FS: She is swimming in a pool.
  de FS: Sie schwimmt in einem Pool.
  EN TP: to swim in a lake
  de TP: in einem See schwimmen
  EN FP: to swim in the sea
  de FP: im Meer schwimmen
3141 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: Gruppe
  EN TS: The group is having a meeting.
  de TS: Die Gruppe hat ein Meeting.
  EN FS: The group is having a party.
  de FS: Die Gruppe hat eine Party.
  EN TP: a group in a circle
  de TP: eine Gruppe im Kreis
  EN FP: a group in a line
  de FP: eine Gruppe in einer Reihe
3143 | to dye (verb): to change the colour of cloth in liquid | loc: färben
  EN TS: He is dyeing cloth blue.
  de TS: Er färbt Stoff blau.
  EN FS: He is dyeing cloth red.
  de FS: Er färbt Stoff rot.
  EN TP: to dye cloth blue
  de TP: Stoff blau färben
  EN FP: to dye your hair blue
  de FP: sich die Haare blau färben
3144 | to weave (verb): to make cloth by crossing threads on a frame | loc: weben
  EN TS: He is weaving cloth.
  de TS: Er webt Stoff.
  EN FS: He is weaving a basket.
  de FS: Er webt einen Korb.
  EN TP: to weave on a loom
  de TP: am Webstuhl weben
  EN FP: to weave through traffic
  de FP: sich durch den Stau schlängeln
3145 | loom (noun): a frame of tight threads for making cloth | loc: Webstuhl
  EN TS: He is working at a tall loom.
  de TS: Er arbeitet an einem hohen Webstuhl.
  EN FS: He is working at a tall desk.
  de FS: Er arbeitet an einem hohen Schreibtisch.
  EN TP: weaving on a wooden loom
  de TP: an einem Holzwebstuhl weben
  EN FP: sewing on a sewing machine
  de FP: an einer Nähmaschine nähen
3147 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: Tuch
  EN TS: Blue cloth is drying on a line above the alley.
  de TS: Blaues Tuch trocknet auf einer Leine über der Gasse.
  EN FS: Blue paper is drying on a line above the alley.
  de FS: Blaues Papier trocknet auf einer Leine über der Gasse.
  EN TP: blue cloth on a line
  de TP: blaues Tuch auf der Leine
  EN FP: a cloth for the table
  de FP: ein Tuch für den Tisch
3148 | to harvest (verb): to cut and gather ripe crops from a field | loc: ernten
  EN TS: The women are harvesting.
  de TS: Die Frauen ernten.
  EN FS: The women are dancing.
  de FS: Die Frauen tanzen.
  EN TP: harvesting golden stalks
  de TP: goldene Halme ernten
  EN FP: harvesting apples
  de FP: Äpfel ernten
3157 | brick (noun): a hard block of baked clay for building walls | loc: Ziegel
  EN TS: He is holding up a red brick.
  de TS: Er hält einen roten Ziegel hoch.
  EN FS: He is holding up a red helmet.
  de FS: Er hält einen roten Helm hoch.
  EN TP: a half-finished brick wall
  de TP: eine halb fertige Ziegelmauer
  EN FP: a brick seaside house
  de FP: ein Ziegelhaus am Meer
3158 | to weld (verb): to join metal by melting its edges | loc: schweißen
  EN TS: The worker is welding steel.
  de TS: Der Arbeiter schweißt Stahl.
  EN FS: The worker is painting steel.
  de FS: Der Arbeiter lackiert Stahl.
  EN TP: to weld a steel plate
  de TP: eine Stahlplatte schweißen
  EN FP: to weld a broken bike
  de FP: ein kaputtes Fahrrad schweißen
3163 | to wash (verb): to clean your body with soap and water | loc: waschen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is washing her hands.
  de TS: Sie wäscht sich die Hände.
  EN FS: She is washing her face.
  de FS: Sie wäscht sich das Gesicht.
  EN TP: washing her hands
  de TP: sich die Hände waschen
  EN FP: washing the dishes
  de FP: das Geschirr abwaschen
3164 | to brush your teeth (phrase): to clean your mouth with toothpaste | loc: sich die Zähne putzen
  EN TS: Time to brush your teeth!
  de TS: Zeit, dir die Zähne zu putzen!
  EN FS: Time to brush your hair!
  de FS: Zeit, dir die Haare zu bürsten!
  EN TP: to brush your teeth
  de TP: sich die Zähne putzen
  EN FP: to brush your hair
  de FP: sich die Haare bürsten
3171 | signpost (noun): a post with arms that point the way | loc: Wegweiser
  EN TS: Such a "helpful" signpost.
  de TS: So ein „hilfreicher“ Wegweiser.
  EN FS: Such a "helpful" map.
  de FS: So eine „hilfreiche“ Karte.
  EN TP: an old wooden signpost
  de TP: ein alter hölzerner Wegweiser
  EN FP: an old wooden fence post
  de FP: ein alter hölzerner Zaunpfahl
3176 | to sit (verb): to rest your weight on your bottom | loc: sitzen
  EN TS: She is sitting under a tree.
  de TS: Sie sitzt unter einem Baum.
  EN FS: She is sitting in a tree.
  de FS: Sie sitzt in einem Baum.
  EN TP: sitting under a tree
  de TP: unter einem Baum sitzen
  EN FP: sitting on a branch
  de FP: auf einem Ast sitzen
3180 | to skate (verb): to glide over ice on special boots | loc: Schlittschuh laufen
  EN TS: She is skating on one leg!
  de TS: Sie läuft auf einem Bein Schlittschuh!
  EN FS: She is skiing on one leg!
  de FS: Sie fährt auf einem Bein Ski!
  EN TP: to skate on a lake
  de TP: auf einem See Schlittschuh laufen
  EN FP: to skate in a park
  de FP: im Park Schlittschuh laufen
3188 | to pray (verb): to speak to God, often kneeling | loc: beten
  EN TS: Someone is praying on a mat.
  de TS: Jemand betet auf einer Matte.
  EN FS: Someone is sleeping on a mat.
  de FS: Jemand schläft auf einer Matte.
  EN TP: to pray on a mat
  de TP: auf einer Matte beten
  EN FP: to pray in a church
  de FP: in einer Kirche beten
3191 | to hug (verb): to put your arms around someone tightly | loc: umarmen
  EN TS: The cat did not ask for this hug.
  de TS: Die Katze wollte nicht umarmt werden.
  EN FS: The dog did not ask for this hug.
  de FS: Der Hund wollte nicht umarmt werden.
  EN TP: to hug a big cat
  de TP: eine große Katze umarmen
  EN FP: to hug a big dog
  de FP: einen großen Hund umarmen
3192 | eyes (noun): the two body parts you see with | loc: Augen
  EN TS: Only her eyes are visible.
  de TS: Nur ihre Augen sind zu sehen.
  EN FS: Only her mouth is visible.
  de FS: Nur ihr Mund ist zu sehen.
  EN TP: only the eyes showing
  de TP: nur die Augen sichtbar
  EN FP: eyes closed in sleep
  de FP: im Schlaf geschlossene Augen
3194 | dentist (noun): a person whose job is to fix and clean teeth | loc: Zahnarzt
  EN TS: The dentist has a drill. Help!
  de TS: Der Zahnarzt hat einen Bohrer. Hilfe!
  EN FS: The dentist has a knife. Help!
  de FS: Der Zahnarzt hat ein Messer. Hilfe!
  EN TP: a dentist with a drill
  de TP: ein Zahnarzt mit Bohrer
  EN FP: a dentist brushing her teeth
  de FP: eine Zahnärztin beim Zähneputzen
3195 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: arbeiten
  EN TS: He is still working. Poor guy.
  de TS: Er arbeitet immer noch. Armer Kerl.
  EN FS: He is still eating. Poor guy.
  de FS: Er isst immer noch. Armer Kerl.
  EN TP: to work late at night
  de TP: spätabends arbeiten
  EN FP: to work out at night
  de FP: spätabends trainieren
3197 | to daydream (verb): to let your mind wander to nice thoughts | loc: tagträumen
  EN TS: She is daydreaming about tea, books and music.
  de TS: Sie tagträumt von Tee, Büchern und Musik.
  EN FS: She is daydreaming about cars, books and music.
  de FS: Sie tagträumt von Autos, Büchern und Musik.
  EN TP: to daydream at a table
  de TP: am Tisch tagträumen
  EN FP: to daydream in bed
  de FP: im Bett tagträumen
3198 | aquarium (noun): a glass tank of water where fish are kept | loc: Aquarium
  EN TS: Their TV is an aquarium.
  de TS: Ihr Fernseher ist ein Aquarium.
  EN FS: Their TV is a fireplace.
  de FS: Ihr Fernseher ist ein Kamin.
  EN TP: fish in an aquarium
  de TP: Fische im Aquarium
  EN FP: fish on a plate
  de FP: Fisch auf dem Teller
3199 | dna (noun): the twisted thread that carries life's code | loc: DNA
  EN TS: This double spiral is DNA.
  de TS: Diese Doppelspirale ist DNA.
  EN FS: This double spiral is a rope.
  de FS: Diese Doppelspirale ist ein Seil.
  EN TP: a glowing DNA spiral
  de TP: eine leuchtende DNA-Spirale
  EN FP: a DNA test kit
  de FP: ein DNA-Testkit
3200 | letter (noun): a written message you send to a person | loc: Brief
  EN TS: The letter is in the middle.
  de TS: Der Brief ist in der Mitte.
  EN FS: The phone is in the middle.
  de FS: Das Handy ist in der Mitte.
  EN TP: a handwritten letter
  de TP: ein handgeschriebener Brief
  EN FP: a printed letter
  de FP: ein gedruckter Brief
3207 | to glow (verb): to give off a soft steady light | loc: leuchten
  EN TS: Who needs a lamp? The plant is glowing.
  de TS: Wer braucht eine Lampe? Die Pflanze leuchtet.
  EN FS: Who needs a lamp? The book is glowing.
  de FS: Wer braucht eine Lampe? Das Buch leuchtet.
  EN TP: a glowing little plant
  de TP: eine leuchtende kleine Pflanze
  EN FP: a glowing fire
  de FP: ein leuchtendes Feuer
3216 | to run (verb): to move fast on your feet | loc: rennen
  EN TS: They are running side by side.
  de TS: Sie rennen Seite an Seite.
  EN FS: They are dancing side by side.
  de FS: Sie tanzen Seite an Seite.
  EN TP: to run side by side
  de TP: Seite an Seite rennen
  EN FP: to run for a bus
  de FP: zum Bus rennen
3222 | to sleep (verb): to rest with your eyes closed, not awake | loc: schlafen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A cat is sleeping like a king.
  de TS: Eine Katze schläft wie ein König.
  EN FS: A dog is sleeping like a king.
  de FS: Ein Hund schläft wie ein König.
  EN TP: sleeping in an armchair
  de TP: im Sessel schlafen
  EN FP: sleeping in a basket
  de FP: im Körbchen schlafen
3235 | koala (noun): a small grey Australian animal living in trees | loc: Koala
  EN TS: Look, the koala has roses.
  de TS: Guck mal, der Koala hat Rosen.
  EN FS: Look, the koala has carrots.
  de FS: Guck mal, der Koala hat Karotten.
  EN TP: a koala holding roses
  de TP: ein Koala mit Rosen
  EN FP: a koala eating leaves
  de FP: ein Koala, der Blätter frisst
3240 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: schreien
  EN TS: He is shouting at us!
  de TS: Er schreit uns an!
  EN FS: He is singing at us!
  de FS: Er singt uns an!
  EN TP: shouting into a megaphone
  de TP: in ein Megafon schreien
  EN FP: shouting at a dog
  de FP: einen Hund anschreien
3242 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: Popcorn
  EN TS: Popcorn in bed with a remote? These cats get it.
  de TS: Popcorn im Bett mit Fernbedienung? Diese Katzen haben's verstanden.
  EN FS: Pizza in bed with a remote? These cats get it.
  de FS: Pizza im Bett mit Fernbedienung? Diese Katzen haben's verstanden.
  EN TP: popcorn in bed
  de TP: Popcorn im Bett
  EN FP: popcorn at the cinema
  de FP: Popcorn im Kino
3243 | network (noun): many things joined by lots of connections | loc: Netzwerk
  EN TS: The network glows blue.
  de TS: Das Netzwerk leuchtet blau.
  EN FS: The network glows red.
  de FS: Das Netzwerk leuchtet rot.
  EN TP: a glowing blue network
  de TP: ein leuchtend blaues Netzwerk
  EN FP: a TV network
  de FP: ein TV-Netzwerk
3256 | band (noun): a group of people who play music together | loc: Band
  EN TS: The band is rocking the club!
  de TS: Die Band rockt den Club!
  EN FS: The band is rocking the beach!
  de FS: Die Band rockt den Strand!
  EN TP: a band on stage
  de TP: eine Band auf der Bühne
  EN FP: a band in a stadium
  de FP: eine Band im Stadion
3266 | to ride (verb): to sit on a bike or horse and move along | loc: fahren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is riding along the bay.
  de TS: Sie fährt an der Bucht entlang.
  EN FS: She is riding along the river.
  de FS: Sie fährt am Fluss entlang.
  EN TP: to ride along the sea
  de TP: am Meer entlangfahren
  EN FP: to ride along the tracks
  de FP: an den Gleisen entlangfahren
3269 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: entspannen
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the roof.
  de TS: Sie entspannt auf dem Dach.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the beach.
  de FS: Sie entspannt am Strand.
  EN TP: relaxing in a deck chair
  de TP: im Liegestuhl entspannen
  EN FP: to relax in a bathtub
  de FP: in der Badewanne entspannen
3272 | briefcase (noun): a stiff flat case for carrying papers | loc: Aktentasche
  EN TS: Heels, briefcase: total boss!
  de TS: High Heels, Aktentasche: absolute Chefin!
  EN FS: Heels, backpack: total boss!
  de FS: High Heels, Rucksack: absolute Chefin!
  EN TP: carrying a leather briefcase
  de TP: eine Aktentasche aus Leder tragen
  EN FP: a briefcase full of money
  de FP: eine Aktentasche voller Geld
3274 | table tennis (noun): a game with small bats and a light plastic ball | loc: Tischtennis
  EN TS: The table tennis bat is red.
  de TS: Der Tischtennisschläger ist rot.
  EN FS: The table tennis bat is black.
  de FS: Der Tischtennisschläger ist schwarz.
  EN TP: a table tennis table
  de TP: eine Tischtennisplatte
  EN FP: table tennis on television
  de FP: Tischtennis im Fernsehen
3277 | to hold (verb): to have something in your hands | loc: halten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The child is holding a star!
  de TS: Das Kind hält einen Stern!
  EN FS: The child is holding a lamp!
  de FS: Das Kind hält eine Lampe!
  EN TP: holding a glowing star
  de TP: einen leuchtenden Stern halten
  EN FP: holding a glowing lamp
  de FP: eine leuchtende Lampe halten
3278 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: Paar
  EN TS: The couple is hugging.
  de TS: Das Paar umarmt sich.
  EN FS: The couple is dancing.
  de FS: Das Paar tanzt.
  EN TP: an embracing couple
  de TP: ein Paar, das sich umarmt
  EN FP: a couple of friends
  de FP: ein paar Freunde
3281 | kite (noun): a cloth wing on strings pulled by the wind | loc: Drachen
  EN TS: The kite does all the work.
  de TS: Der Drachen macht die ganze Arbeit.
  EN FS: The boat does all the work.
  de FS: Das Boot macht die ganze Arbeit.
  EN TP: pulled by a kite
  de TP: von einem Drachen gezogen
  EN FP: a kite in the park
  de FP: ein Drachen im Park
3283 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: Möwe
  EN TS: The seagull is a tourist now.
  de TS: Die Möwe ist jetzt Touristin.
  EN FS: The pigeon is a tourist now.
  de FS: Die Taube ist jetzt Touristin.
  EN TP: a seagull on a pier
  de TP: eine Möwe auf dem Steg
  EN FP: a seagull on a boat
  de FP: eine Möwe auf einem Boot
3285 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: Kostüm
  EN TS: Her costume has toy parrots!
  de TS: Ihr Kostüm hat Spielzeugpapageien!
  EN FS: Her costume has toy snakes!
  de FS: Ihr Kostüm hat Spielzeugschlangen!
  EN TP: a fruit headdress costume
  de TP: ein Kostüm mit Obst-Kopfschmuck
  EN FP: a Halloween costume
  de FP: ein Halloween-Kostüm
3288 | stilts (noun): two long poles you stand on to walk up high | loc: Stelzen
  EN TS: They are walking on stilts.
  de TS: Sie laufen auf Stelzen.
  EN FS: They are walking on a stage.
  de FS: Sie laufen auf einer Bühne.
  EN TP: walking on tall stilts
  de TP: auf hohen Stelzen laufen
  EN FP: houses on stilts
  de FP: Häuser auf Stelzen
3293 | to punch (verb): to hit hard with your closed hand | loc: boxen
  EN TS: She punched, glove up high!
  de TS: Sie boxt, Handschuh ganz oben!
  EN FS: She punched, glove down low!
  de FS: Sie boxt, Handschuh ganz unten!
  EN TP: punching in the ring
  de TP: im Ring boxen
  EN FP: punching a ticket
  de FP: ein Ticket entwerten
3294 | to kick (verb): to hit something with your foot | loc: treten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is going to kick the ball!
  de TS: Er tritt gleich gegen den Ball!
  EN FS: He is going to throw the ball!
  de FS: Er wirft gleich den Ball!
  EN TP: about to kick the ball
  de TP: kurz davor, den Ball zu treten
  EN FP: to kick a door open
  de FP: eine Tür auftreten
3301 | to steer (verb): to turn a wheel to control where a boat goes | loc: steuern
  EN TS: He is steering the ship.
  de TS: Er steuert das Schiff.
  EN FS: He is steering the car.
  de FS: Er steuert das Auto.
  EN TP: steering a big ship
  de TP: ein großes Schiff steuern
  EN FP: steering a small car
  de FP: ein kleines Auto steuern
3303 | paper plane (noun): a folded sheet you throw so it flies | loc: Papierflieger
  EN TS: His paper plane is flying!
  de TS: Sein Papierflieger fliegt!
  EN FS: His kite is flying!
  de FS: Sein Drachen fliegt!
  EN TP: throwing a paper plane
  de TP: einen Papierflieger werfen
  EN FP: folding a paper plane
  de FP: einen Papierflieger falten
3304 | hockey stick (noun): a long stick with a bent end for the puck | loc: Hockeyschläger
  EN TS: The hockey stick is for the puck, I think.
  de TS: Der Hockeyschläger ist für den Puck, glaub ich.
  EN FS: The hockey stick is for the ball, I think.
  de FS: Der Hockeyschläger ist für den Ball, glaub ich.
  EN TP: a hockey stick on ice
  de TP: ein Hockeyschläger auf dem Eis
  EN FP: a broken hockey stick
  de FP: ein kaputter Hockeyschläger
3306 | rooster (noun): a male chicken that crows in the morning | loc: Hahn
  EN TS: The rooster owns the world.
  de TS: Dem Hahn gehört die Welt.
  EN FS: The eagle owns the world.
  de FS: Dem Adler gehört die Welt.
  EN TP: a rooster on a globe
  de TP: ein Hahn auf einem Globus
  EN FP: a rooster on a fence
  de FP: ein Hahn auf einem Zaun
3311 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: der Tunnel
  EN TS: She is walking into a tunnel.
  de TS: Sie geht in einen Tunnel.
  EN FS: She is walking into a lake.
  de FS: Sie geht in einen See.
  EN TP: a tunnel of rock
  de TP: ein Tunnel aus Fels
  EN FP: a tunnel under a river
  de FP: ein Tunnel unter einem Fluss
3313 | stadium (noun): a big sports ground with seats all around | loc: Stadion
  EN TS: What a "packed" stadium.
  de TS: Was für ein „volles“ Stadion.
  EN FS: What a "packed" beach.
  de FS: Was für ein „voller“ Strand.
  EN TP: an empty stadium
  de TP: ein leeres Stadion
  EN FP: a full stadium
  de FP: ein volles Stadion
3314 | to jog (verb): to run slowly and steadily for exercise | loc: joggen
  EN TS: She is jogging with earphones.
  de TS: Sie joggt mit Kopfhörern.
  EN FS: She is jogging with a dog.
  de FS: Sie joggt mit einem Hund.
  EN TP: jogging along a road
  de TP: eine Straße entlangjoggen
  EN FP: jogging along the beach
  de FP: am Strand entlangjoggen
3317 | alpaca (noun): a woolly farm animal with a long neck | loc: Alpaka
  EN TS: The alpaca wants to be in the photo.
  de TS: Das Alpaka will mit aufs Foto.
  EN FS: The horse wants to be in the photo.
  de FS: Das Pferd will mit aufs Foto.
  EN TP: a curious brown alpaca
  de TP: ein neugieriges braunes Alpaka
  EN FP: a sleeping brown alpaca
  de FP: ein schlafendes braunes Alpaka
3323 | hippo (noun): a very big grey animal that lives in rivers | loc: Nilpferd
  EN TS: The baby hippo is very busy.
  de TS: Das kleine Nilpferd ist sehr beschäftigt.
  EN FS: The baby lion is very busy.
  de FS: Der kleine Löwe ist sehr beschäftigt.
  EN TP: a baby hippo resting
  de TP: ein ruhendes Nilpferdbaby
  EN FP: a baby hippo swimming
  de FP: ein schwimmendes Nilpferdbaby
3325 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: Magie
  EN TS: Magic sparks from an old book!
  de TS: Magie sprüht aus einem alten Buch!
  EN FS: Magic sparks from an old cup!
  de FS: Magie sprüht aus einer alten Tasse!
  EN TP: magic from an old book
  de TP: Magie aus einem alten Buch
  EN FP: a magic show on stage
  de FP: eine Zaubershow auf der Bühne
3341 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: die Trompete
  EN TS: One guy has a gold trumpet.
  de TS: Ein Typ hat eine goldene Trompete.
  EN FS: One guy has a gold violin.
  de FS: Ein Typ hat eine goldene Geige.
  EN TP: a golden trumpet
  de TP: eine goldene Trompete
  EN FP: playing the trumpet
  de FP: Trompete spielen
3346 | library (noun): a place full of books you can read or borrow | loc: Bibliothek
  EN TS: Two people are in a library.
  de TS: Zwei Leute sind in einer Bibliothek.
  EN FS: Two people are in a kitchen.
  de FS: Zwei Leute sind in einer Küche.
  EN TP: two people in a library
  de TP: zwei Leute in einer Bibliothek
  EN FP: a library card
  de FP: ein Bibliotheksausweis
3357 | net (noun): a wall of string with holes across a court | loc: Netz
  EN TS: A tall chair by the net.
  de TS: Ein hoher Stuhl am Netz.
  EN FS: A tall ladder by the net.
  de FS: Eine hohe Leiter am Netz.
  EN TP: a net across the court
  de TP: ein Netz quer über den Platz
  EN FP: a net for fishing
  de FP: ein Netz zum Fischen
3362 | raccoon (noun): a grey animal with a black mask of fur | loc: Waschbär
  EN TS: Bro, the raccoon is staring.
  de TS: Bro, der Waschbär starrt.
  EN FS: Bro, the cat is staring.
  de FS: Bro, die Katze starrt.
  EN TP: a raccoon on a ledge
  de TP: ein Waschbär auf einem Sims
  EN FP: a raccoon in a bin
  de FP: ein Waschbär in der Mülltonne
3368 | sloth (noun): a slow tree animal with long curved claws | loc: Faultier
  EN TS: The sloth is in no hurry.
  de TS: Das Faultier hat keine Eile.
  EN FS: The koala is in no hurry.
  de FS: Der Koala hat keine Eile.
  EN TP: a smiling sloth
  de TP: ein lächelndes Faultier
  EN FP: a sleeping sloth
  de FP: ein schlafendes Faultier
3369 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: riechen
  EN TS: It is smelling a blue flower.
  de TS: Es riecht an einer blauen Blume.
  EN FS: It is smelling a red flower.
  de FS: Es riecht an einer roten Blume.
  EN TP: to smell a flower
  de TP: an einer Blume riechen
  EN FP: to smell the soup
  de FP: an der Suppe riechen
3379 | ball (noun): a round object you hit, throw or kick in games | loc: Ball
  EN TS: He is running to the ball.
  de TS: Er rennt zum Ball.
  EN FS: He is running from the ball.
  de FS: Er rennt vom Ball weg.
  EN TP: running to the ball
  de TP: zum Ball rennen
  EN FP: a ball in the sky
  de FP: ein Ball am Himmel
3382 | parrot (noun): a bright tropical bird with a curved beak | loc: Papagei
  EN TS: Yo, this parrot is a pirate.
  de TS: Yo, dieser Papagei ist ein Pirat.
  EN FS: Yo, this parrot is a chef.
  de FS: Yo, dieser Papagei ist ein Koch.
  EN TP: a parrot wearing an eyepatch
  de TP: ein Papagei mit Augenklappe
  EN FP: a parrot in a cage
  de FP: ein Papagei im Käfig
3383 | chick (noun): a baby bird, especially a baby hen | loc: Küken
  EN TS: A chick is surfing a wave!
  de TS: Ein Küken surft auf einer Welle!
  EN FS: A duck is surfing a wave!
  de FS: Eine Ente surft auf einer Welle!
  EN TP: a surfing chick
  de TP: ein surfendes Küken
  EN FP: a chick in an egg
  de FP: ein Küken im Ei
3390 | to kiss (verb): to touch someone with your lips | loc: küssen
  EN TS: They are kissing among roses.
  de TS: Sie küssen sich zwischen Rosen.
  EN FS: They are kissing on a beach.
  de FS: Sie küssen sich am Strand.
  EN TP: kissing in a rose garden
  de TP: sich im Rosengarten küssen
  EN FP: kissing on a bridge
  de FP: sich auf einer Brücke küssen
3392 | owl (noun): a round-faced bird that hunts at night | loc: Eule
  EN TS: The owl is on the night shift.
  de TS: Die Eule hat Nachtschicht.
  EN FS: The owl is on the day shift.
  de FS: Die Eule hat Tagschicht.
  EN TP: an owl in the snow
  de TP: eine Eule im Schnee
  EN FP: a white owl in flight
  de FP: eine weiße Eule im Flug
3395 | fog (noun): thick cloud near the ground that hides things | loc: Nebel
  EN TS: Fog hides the mountains.
  de TS: Nebel verhüllt die Berge.
  EN FS: Fog hides the city.
  de FS: Nebel verhüllt die Stadt.
  EN TP: thick fog on the peaks
  de TP: dichter Nebel auf den Gipfeln
  EN FP: fog on a bathroom mirror
  de FP: Nebel auf dem Badezimmerspiegel
3401 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: Ampel
  EN TS: The traffic light has flowers!
  de TS: Die Ampel hat Blumen!
  EN FS: The traffic light has candles!
  de FS: Die Ampel hat Kerzen!
  EN TP: a flowery traffic light
  de TP: eine Ampel mit Blumen
  EN FP: a broken traffic light
  de FP: eine kaputte Ampel
3406 | to dive (verb): to go down under the water head first | loc: tauchen
  EN TS: Someone is diving with a sea monster!
  de TS: Jemand taucht mit einem Seeungeheuer!
  EN FS: Someone is diving with a shark!
  de FS: Jemand taucht mit einem Hai!
  EN TP: diving over a reef
  de TP: über einem Riff tauchen
  EN FP: diving off a cliff
  de FP: von einer Klippe springen
3412 | to lift (verb): to raise something up off the ground | loc: heben
  EN TS: She is lifting in a red dress!
  de TS: Sie hebt Gewichte im roten Kleid!
  EN FS: She is lifting in a red coat!
  de FS: Sie hebt Gewichte im roten Mantel!
  EN TP: to lift a barbell
  de TP: eine Langhantel heben
  EN FP: to lift a suitcase
  de FP: einen Koffer heben
3418 | drums (noun): a set of round instruments you hit with sticks | loc: Schlagzeug
  EN TS: She is about to hit the drums.
  de TS: Sie haut gleich aufs Schlagzeug.
  EN FS: She is about to hit the gong.
  de FS: Sie haut gleich auf den Gong.
  EN TP: playing the drums
  de TP: Schlagzeug spielen
  EN FP: carrying the drums
  de FP: das Schlagzeug tragen
3419 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: die Trompete
  EN TS: He is blowing a trumpet.
  de TS: Er bläst in eine Trompete.
  EN FS: He is blowing a whistle.
  de FS: Er bläst in eine Pfeife.
  EN TP: blowing a golden trumpet
  de TP: eine goldene Trompete blasen
  EN FP: cleaning a golden trumpet
  de FP: eine goldene Trompete putzen
3420 | double bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, played standing | loc: Kontrabass
  EN TS: The double bass is taller than her.
  de TS: Der Kontrabass ist größer als sie.
  EN FS: The double bass is smaller than her.
  de FS: Der Kontrabass ist kleiner als sie.
  EN TP: bowing a double bass
  de TP: einen Kontrabass streichen
  EN FP: carrying a double bass
  de FP: einen Kontrabass tragen
3422 | orchestra (noun): a big group that plays classical music | loc: Orchester
  EN TS: She is leading the orchestra.
  de TS: Sie leitet das Orchester.
  EN FS: She is leading the choir.
  de FS: Sie leitet den Chor.
  EN TP: leading an orchestra
  de TP: ein Orchester leiten
  EN FP: playing in an orchestra
  de FP: in einem Orchester spielen
3423 | harp (noun): a tall instrument with strings you pluck | loc: Harfe
  EN TS: She is plucking the harp.
  de TS: Sie zupft die Harfe.
  EN FS: She is plucking the guitar.
  de FS: Sie zupft die Gitarre.
  EN TP: plucking a tall harp
  de TP: eine große Harfe zupfen
  EN FP: carrying a tall harp
  de FP: eine große Harfe tragen
3424 | conductor (noun): the person who leads an orchestra on stage | loc: Dirigent | translator note: FP pun conductor/train conductor does not exist in German; kept Dirigent in a train
  EN TS: The conductor holds a baton.
  de TS: Der Dirigent hält einen Taktstock.
  EN FS: The conductor holds a flute.
  de FS: Der Dirigent hält eine Flöte.
  EN TP: a conductor in a tailcoat
  de TP: ein Dirigent im Frack
  EN FP: a conductor on a train
  de FP: ein Dirigent im Zug
3428 | violin (noun): a small string instrument played with a bow | loc: die Geige
  EN TS: She is playing the violin beautifully.
  de TS: Sie spielt wunderschön Geige.
  EN FS: She is playing the cello beautifully.
  de FS: Sie spielt wunderschön Cello.
  EN TP: playing the violin
  de TP: Geige spielen
  EN FP: tuning the violin
  de FP: die Geige stimmen
3431 | clarinet (noun): a long black wind instrument with keys | loc: Klarinette
  EN TS: She is playing a clarinet.
  de TS: Sie spielt Klarinette.
  EN FS: She is playing a trumpet.
  de FS: Sie spielt Trompete.
  EN TP: blowing into a clarinet
  de TP: in eine Klarinette blasen
  EN FP: cleaning a clarinet
  de FP: eine Klarinette putzen
3435 | cave (noun): a large hole in rock you can go into | loc: Höhle
  EN TS: Two cave mouths in the cliff.
  de TS: Zwei Höhlen in der Klippe.
  EN FS: Two cave mouths in the sand.
  de FS: Zwei Höhlen im Sand.
  EN TP: a sea cave in cliffs
  de TP: eine Meereshöhle in den Klippen
  EN FP: a cave full of bats
  de FP: eine Höhle voller Fledermäuse
3441 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: Wassermelone
  EN TS: She is leaning on watermelons.
  de TS: Sie lehnt an Wassermelonen.
  EN FS: She is leaning on pumpkins.
  de FS: Sie lehnt an Kürbissen.
  EN TP: a crate of watermelons
  de TP: eine Kiste Wassermelonen
  EN FP: a watermelon juice stand
  de FP: ein Stand mit Wassermelonensaft
3447 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: Statue
  EN TS: A statue under the Milky Way.
  de TS: Eine Statue unter der Milchstraße.
  EN FS: A statue under a rainbow.
  de FS: Eine Statue unter einem Regenbogen.
  EN TP: a stone statue at night
  de TP: eine Steinstatue bei Nacht
  EN FP: a statue in a park
  de FP: eine Statue im Park
3458 | stars (noun): the bright points of light in the night sky | loc: Sterne
  EN TS: Stone heads under the stars.
  de TS: Steinköpfe unter den Sternen.
  EN FS: Stone heads under the sun.
  de FS: Steinköpfe unter der Sonne.
  EN TP: stars over stone heads
  de TP: Sterne über Steinköpfen
  EN FP: stars on a flag
  de FP: Sterne auf einer Flagge
3463 | canoe (noun): a narrow boat you move with a paddle | loc: Kanu
  EN TS: He is paddling a canoe.
  de TS: Er paddelt ein Kanu.
  EN FS: He is paddling a raft.
  de FS: Er paddelt ein Floß.
  EN TP: paddling a canoe at sunset
  de TP: ein Kanu im Sonnenuntergang paddeln
  EN FP: carrying a canoe at sunset
  de FP: ein Kanu im Sonnenuntergang tragen
3469 | cheetah (noun): a slim spotted wild cat that runs very fast | loc: Gepard
  EN TS: The cheetah is taking a break.
  de TS: Der Gepard macht Pause.
  EN FS: The cheetah is taking a bath.
  de FS: Der Gepard nimmt ein Bad.
  EN TP: a cheetah at sunset
  de TP: ein Gepard im Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a cheetah running fast
  de FP: ein rennender Gepard
3470 | dune (noun): a hill of sand shaped by the wind | loc: Düne
  EN TS: One huge orange sand dune.
  de TS: Eine riesige orange Düne aus Sand.
  EN FS: One huge white sand dune.
  de FS: Eine riesige weiße Düne aus Sand.
  EN TP: a dune's curved crest
  de TP: der geschwungene Kamm einer Düne
  EN FP: a dune by the sea
  de FP: eine Düne am Meer
3472 | to spin (verb): to turn round and round quickly | loc: sich drehen
  EN TS: Lovely dress! She is spinning in it.
  de TS: Schönes Kleid! Sie dreht sich darin.
  EN FS: Lovely hat! She is spinning in it.
  de FS: Schöner Hut! Sie dreht sich darin.
  EN TP: spinning in a red dress
  de TP: sich im roten Kleid drehen
  EN FP: spinning in a blue dress
  de FP: sich im blauen Kleid drehen
3473 | flamingo (noun): a tall pink water bird with a bent beak | loc: Flamingo
  EN TS: The flamingo is in the water.
  de TS: Der Flamingo steht im Wasser.
  EN FS: The flamingo is in a tree.
  de FS: Der Flamingo steht in einem Baum.
  EN TP: a flamingo in the water
  de TP: ein Flamingo im Wasser
  EN FP: a flamingo in flight
  de FP: ein Flamingo im Flug
3479 | handbag (noun): a small bag for carrying your things | loc: Handtasche
  EN TS: A pink handbag, a quiet cafe.
  de TS: Eine pinke Handtasche, ein ruhiges Café.
  EN FS: A pink laptop, a quiet cafe.
  de FS: Ein pinker Laptop, ein ruhiges Café.
  EN TP: a handbag on the table
  de TP: eine Handtasche auf dem Tisch
  EN FP: a handbag in a shop
  de FP: eine Handtasche im Laden
3482 | steps (noun): a flight of stairs you walk up or down | loc: Stufen
  EN TS: She is chilling on the steps.
  de TS: Sie chillt auf den Stufen.
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the steps.
  de FS: Sie schläft auf den Stufen.
  EN TP: sunny stone steps
  de TP: sonnige Steinstufen
  EN FP: steps in a dance
  de FP: Stufen einer Rolltreppe
3485 | to touch (verb): to put your hand or finger on something | loc: berühren
  EN TS: She is touching the elephant.
  de TS: Sie berührt den Elefanten.
  EN FS: She is touching the tiger.
  de FS: Sie berührt den Tiger.
  EN TP: to touch an elephant
  de TP: einen Elefanten berühren
  EN FP: to touch a tree trunk
  de FP: einen Baumstamm berühren
3486 | coconut (noun): a big hard tropical nut with sweet juice inside | loc: Kokosnuss
  EN TS: She's drinking from a coconut.
  de TS: Sie trinkt aus einer Kokosnuss.
  EN FS: She's drinking from a bottle.
  de FS: Sie trinkt aus einer Flasche.
  EN TP: a coconut with a straw
  de TP: eine Kokosnuss mit Strohhalm
  EN FP: opening a coconut
  de FP: eine Kokosnuss öffnen
3489 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: lachen
  EN TS: Wine in a boat? She is laughing.
  de TS: Wein im Boot? Sie lacht.
  EN FS: Wine in a car? She is laughing.
  de FS: Wein im Auto? Sie lacht.
  EN TP: to laugh in a boat
  de TP: im Boot lachen
  EN FP: to laugh at a boat
  de FP: über ein Boot lachen
3493 | footprints (noun): the marks your feet leave on soft ground | loc: Fußspuren
  EN TS: She is leaving footprints.
  de TS: Sie hinterlässt Fußspuren.
  EN FS: She is leaving flowers.
  de FS: Sie hinterlässt Blumen.
  EN TP: a line of footprints
  de TP: eine Reihe Fußspuren
  EN FP: footprints in the snow
  de FP: Fußspuren im Schnee
3494 | to stretch (verb): to pull your body out long to feel looser | loc: dehnen
  EN TS: She is stretching to the sun.
  de TS: Sie dehnt sich Richtung Sonne.
  EN FS: He is stretching to the sun.
  de FS: Er dehnt sich Richtung Sonne.
  EN TP: stretching both arms up
  de TP: beide Arme nach oben dehnen
  EN FP: stretching a rubber band
  de FP: ein Gummiband dehnen
3497 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: Sonnenuntergang
  EN TS: She is walking into the sunset. Classic.
  de TS: Sie läuft in den Sonnenuntergang. Klassiker.
  EN FS: She is walking into the sea. Classic.
  de FS: Sie läuft ins Meer. Klassiker.
  EN TP: walking into the sunset
  de TP: in den Sonnenuntergang laufen
  EN FP: watching a sunset by car
  de FP: Sonnenuntergang vom Auto aus
3513 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: Braut
  EN TS: The bride's veil is very long.
  de TS: Der Schleier der Braut ist sehr lang.
  EN FS: The bride's veil is very dark.
  de FS: Der Schleier der Braut ist sehr dunkel.
  EN TP: a bride's long veil
  de TP: der lange Schleier einer Braut
  EN FP: a bride with a bouquet
  de FP: eine Braut mit Brautstrauß
3516 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: die Vase
  EN TS: The vase holds one flower.
  de TS: In der Vase steht eine Blume.
  EN FS: The vase holds ten flowers.
  de FS: In der Vase stehen zehn Blumen.
  EN TP: a vase on a shelf
  de TP: eine Vase im Regal
  EN FP: a vase on a table
  de FP: eine Vase auf dem Tisch
3519 | earring (noun): a piece of jewellery worn on your ear | loc: Ohrring
  EN TS: That white earring is lovely.
  de TS: Der weiße Ohrring ist wunderschön.
  EN FS: That white necklace is lovely.
  de FS: Die weiße Kette ist wunderschön.
  EN TP: a white teardrop earring
  de TP: ein weißer Tropfen-Ohrring
  EN FP: an earring on the floor
  de FP: ein Ohrring auf dem Boden
3522 | jellyfish (noun): a soft see-through sea animal with tentacles | loc: Qualle
  EN TS: Fact: this jellyfish glows.
  de TS: Fakt: Diese Qualle leuchtet.
  EN FS: Fact: this starfish glows.
  de FS: Fakt: Dieser Seestern leuchtet.
  EN TP: a glowing jellyfish
  de TP: eine leuchtende Qualle
  EN FP: a jellyfish on the beach
  de FP: eine Qualle am Strand
3541 | waterfall (noun): water falling straight down from a high rock | loc: der Wasserfall
  EN TS: A tall waterfall, a tiny lake.
  de TS: Ein hoher Wasserfall, ein winziger See.
  EN FS: A tall waterfall, a tiny boat.
  de FS: Ein hoher Wasserfall, ein winziges Boot.
  EN TP: a waterfall from a cliff
  de TP: ein Wasserfall von einer Klippe
  EN FP: a waterfall in a garden
  de FP: ein Wasserfall im Garten
3548 | to smoke (verb): to breathe in smoke from a cigarette | loc: rauchen
  EN TS: She is smoking in a tuxedo.
  de TS: Sie raucht im Smoking.
  EN FS: She is smoking in a dress.
  de FS: Sie raucht im Kleid.
  EN TP: smoking a cigarette
  de TP: eine Zigarette rauchen
  EN FP: smoking a pipe
  de FP: Pfeife rauchen
3552 | japan (noun): the East Asian country of Mount Fuji | loc: Japan
  EN TS: Japan in spring, Fuji behind.
  de TS: Japan im Frühling, der Fuji dahinter.
  EN FS: Japan in winter, Fuji behind.
  de FS: Japan im Winter, der Fuji dahinter.
  EN TP: a spring lane in Japan
  de TP: eine Frühlingsgasse in Japan
  EN FP: a Japan travel guide
  de FP: ein Reiseführer für Japan
3556 | llama (noun): a tall woolly Andean animal that carries loads | loc: Lama
  EN TS: The llamas dressed up for the photo.
  de TS: Die Lamas haben sich fürs Foto schick gemacht.
  EN FS: The goats dressed up for the photo.
  de FS: Die Ziegen haben sich fürs Foto schick gemacht.
  EN TP: llamas with blankets
  de TP: Lamas mit Decken
  EN FP: llamas in the snow
  de FP: Lamas im Schnee
3559 | island (noun): a piece of land with water all around it | loc: Insel
  EN TS: Tiny island, zero neighbours.
  de TS: Winzige Insel, null Nachbarn.
  EN FS: Tiny island, zero cacti.
  de FS: Winzige Insel, null Kakteen.
  EN TP: a tiny rocky island
  de TP: eine winzige Felseninsel
  EN FP: an island with a hotel
  de FP: eine Insel mit Hotel
3561 | donkey (noun): a small grey animal with long ears | loc: Esel
  EN TS: The donkey does deliveries.
  de TS: Der Esel macht die Lieferungen.
  EN FS: The horse does deliveries.
  de FS: Das Pferd macht die Lieferungen.
  EN TP: leading a loaded donkey
  de TP: einen beladenen Esel führen
  EN FP: riding a loaded donkey
  de FP: auf einem beladenen Esel reiten
3562 | egypt (noun): the country of the pyramids and the Nile | loc: Ägypten
  EN TS: Ancient Egypt by the Nile.
  de TS: Das alte Ägypten am Nil.
  EN FS: Ancient Egypt in the snow.
  de FS: Das alte Ägypten im Schnee.
  EN TP: ancient Egypt on the Nile
  de TP: das alte Ägypten am Nil
  EN FP: a holiday photo in Egypt
  de FP: ein Urlaubsfoto aus Ägypten
3564 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: Rentier
  EN TS: The reindeer are in the snow.
  de TS: Die Rentiere sind im Schnee.
  EN FS: The reindeer are on the beach.
  de FS: Die Rentiere sind am Strand.
  EN TP: reindeer in the snow
  de TP: Rentiere im Schnee
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  de FP: Rentiere vor einem Schlitten
3567 | peru (noun): the South American country of Machu Picchu | loc: Peru
  EN TS: A red sun hangs over Peru.
  de TS: Eine rote Sonne hängt über Peru.
  EN FS: A yellow sun hangs over Peru.
  de FS: Eine gelbe Sonne hängt über Peru.
  EN TP: the ruins of Peru
  de TP: die Ruinen von Peru
  EN FP: the flag of Peru
  de FP: die Flagge von Peru
3572 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: pflücken
  EN TS: The women are picking tea.
  de TS: Die Frauen pflücken Tee.
  EN FS: The women are picking apples.
  de FS: Die Frauen pflücken Äpfel.
  EN TP: picking tea leaves
  de TP: Teeblätter pflücken
  EN FP: picking flowers
  de FP: Blumen pflücken
3585 | zebra (noun): a wild horse with black and white stripes | loc: Zebra
  EN TS: One zebra is having lunch.
  de TS: Ein Zebra macht Mittagspause.
  EN FS: One zebra is having a bath.
  de FS: Ein Zebra nimmt ein Bad.
  EN TP: zebras on a hill
  de TP: Zebras auf einem Hügel
  EN FP: zebras in a river
  de FP: Zebras in einem Fluss
3586 | tortoise (noun): a slow land animal with a hard shell | loc: Landschildkröte
  EN TS: The tortoise is in a hurry.
  de TS: Die Landschildkröte hat es eilig.
  EN FS: The crab is in a hurry.
  de FS: Die Krabbe hat es eilig.
  EN TP: a giant tortoise
  de TP: eine riesige Landschildkröte
  EN FP: a tortoise swimming in water
  de FP: eine Landschildkröte im Wasser
3589 | gorilla (noun): a very large black ape with huge arms | loc: Gorilla
  EN TS: The gorilla is just chilling.
  de TS: Der Gorilla chillt einfach.
  EN FS: The gorilla is just eating.
  de FS: Der Gorilla isst einfach.
  EN TP: a gorilla among bamboo
  de TP: ein Gorilla im Bambus
  EN FP: a gorilla beating its chest
  de FP: ein Gorilla trommelt auf die Brust
3590 | ostrich (noun): a huge bird with long legs that cannot fly | loc: Strauß
  EN TS: An ostrich is walking on sand.
  de TS: Ein Strauß läuft über den Sand.
  EN FS: A camel is walking on sand.
  de FS: Ein Kamel läuft über den Sand.
  EN TP: an ostrich in the desert
  de TP: ein Strauß in der Wüste
  EN FP: an ostrich hiding its head
  de FP: ein Strauß versteckt den Kopf
3592 | to exercise (verb): to move your body in a planned way to get fit | loc: trainieren
  EN TS: Both are exercising hard.
  de TS: Beide trainieren richtig hart.
  EN FS: Both are dancing hard.
  de FS: Beide tanzen richtig wild.
  EN TP: to exercise together
  de TP: zusammen trainieren
  EN FP: to exercise a dog
  de FP: einen Hund trainieren
3598 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: lockig
  EN TS: Her curly hair is in blue pen.
  de TS: Ihr lockiges Haar ist mit blauem Stift gemalt.
  EN FS: Her curly hair is in red pen.
  de FS: Ihr lockiges Haar ist mit rotem Stift gemalt.
  EN TP: curly hair in blue pen
  de TP: lockiges Haar in blauem Stift
  EN FP: curly hair in red paint
  de FP: lockiges Haar in roter Farbe
3619 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: Adler
  EN TS: An eagle is above the river.
  de TS: Ein Adler ist über dem Fluss.
  EN FS: An eagle is above the city.
  de FS: Ein Adler ist über der Stadt.
  EN TP: an eagle over the river
  de TP: ein Adler über dem Fluss
  EN FP: an eagle over the mountains
  de FP: ein Adler über den Bergen
3629 | to shake hands (phrase): to grip another person's palm to greet them | loc: die Hand schütteln
  EN TS: They are shaking hands like in Star Wars!
  de TS: Sie schütteln sich die Hand wie in Star Wars!
  EN FS: They are fighting like in Star Wars!
  de FS: Sie kämpfen wie in Star Wars!
  EN TP: shaking hands with an alien
  de TP: einem Alien die Hand schütteln
  EN FP: shaking hands with a robot
  de FP: einem Roboter die Hand schütteln
3633 | to float (verb): to stay on top of water without sinking | loc: treiben
  EN TS: Floating in space? No, in a pool.
  de TS: Im All treiben? Nein, im Pool.
  EN FS: Floating in space? No, in a lake.
  de FS: Im All treiben? Nein, in einem See.
  EN TP: floating on his back
  de TP: auf dem Rücken treiben
  EN FP: floating in open space
  de FP: im offenen All treiben
3638 | to mop (verb): to clean a floor with a wet mop | loc: wischen
  EN TS: Space job: mopping the floor.
  de TS: Job im All: den Boden wischen.
  EN FS: Space job: painting the floor.
  de FS: Job im All: den Boden streichen.
  EN TP: mopping a shiny floor
  de TP: einen glänzenden Boden wischen
  EN FP: mopping up spilled coffee
  de FP: verschütteten Kaffee aufwischen
3639 | stool (noun): a high seat with no back, used at a counter | loc: Hocker
  EN TS: Best seat in space: a red stool.
  de TS: Bester Platz im All: ein roter Hocker.
  EN FS: Best seat in space: a blue stool.
  de FS: Bester Platz im All: ein blauer Hocker.
  EN TP: sitting on a red stool
  de TP: auf einem roten Hocker sitzen
  EN FP: a stool in the bathroom
  de FP: ein Hocker im Bad
3640 | to shine (verb): to point light at something | loc: leuchten
  EN TS: The lamp is shining in space.
  de TS: Die Lampe leuchtet ins All.
  EN FS: The lamp is shining at a ship.
  de FS: Die Lampe leuchtet auf ein Schiff.
  EN TP: shining a beam into space
  de TP: einen Strahl ins All leuchten
  EN FP: a light on a ship
  de FP: ein Licht auf einem Schiff
3641 | vending machine (noun): a machine you put money in to get a drink | loc: der Verkaufsautomat
  EN TS: Even on this planet, a vending machine!
  de TS: Sogar auf diesem Planeten: ein Verkaufsautomat!
  EN FS: Even on this planet, a coffee shop!
  de FS: Sogar auf diesem Planeten: ein Café!
  EN TP: a lit vending machine
  de TP: ein beleuchteter Verkaufsautomat
  EN FP: a broken vending machine
  de FP: ein kaputter Verkaufsautomat
3642 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: ziehen
  EN TS: He is pulling a planet!
  de TS: Er zieht einen Planeten!
  EN FS: He is pulling a rocket!
  de FS: Er zieht eine Rakete!
  EN TP: to pull on a string
  de TP: an einer Schnur ziehen
  EN FP: to pull a tooth
  de FP: einen Zahn ziehen
3644 | to water (verb): to give a plant a drink so it can grow | loc: gießen
  EN TS: He is watering a tiny plant.
  de TS: Er gießt eine winzige Pflanze.
  EN FS: He is watering a tall tree.
  de FS: Er gießt einen hohen Baum.
  EN TP: watering a tiny seedling
  de TP: einen winzigen Setzling gießen
  EN FP: watering a big garden
  de FP: einen großen Garten gießen
